<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88127-0012 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-27-88.f2.A1011</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 17 / Wednesday, January 27, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Mine Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Part 75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Safety Standards for Roof, Face and Rib Support</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="44">January 4, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency: </T2>Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA), Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary: </T2>This rule revises the Mine Safety and Health Administration'sexisting safety standards for roof, face and rib support in undergroundcoal mines. The revisions update existing provisions consistent with advancesin mining technology, eliminate duplicative and unnecessary standards,provide alternative methods of compliance and reduce paperwork requirementswhere possible.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>effective date: </T2>March 28, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact: </T2>Patricia W. Silvey, Director,Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances, MSHA (703) 235-1910.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>The Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) is revising its existingsafety standards for roof, face and rib support at underground coal mines.These revisions are promulgated pursuant to section 101 of the FederalMine Safety and Health Act of 1977, Pub. L. 91-173 as amended by Pub. L.95-164, 91 Stat. 1291 (30 U.S.C. 811).This final rule is part of MSHA's comprehensive review of the undergroundcoal mining standards in 30 CFR Part 75. On September 2, 1983, MSHA publisheda notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> which announced the availability of its preproposaldraft and scheduled public conferences (48 FR 40165). Public conferenceswere held October 25, 1983, in Salt Lake City, Utah, and October 27, 1983,in Charleston, West Virginia. These conferences were well-attended by representativesof the mining community. MSHA received written comments regarding its preproposaldraft from all segments of the coal mining community.After reviewing the comments received in response to the preproposal draft,MSHA published a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (50 FR 41784) on October 15, 1985. On January17, 1986, MSHA published a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> which outlined major issues raised by commentersto the proposed rule and scheduled public hearings (51 FR 2525). Publichearings were held on February 24, 1986 in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, February25, 1986 in Lexington, Kentucky, and February 27, 1986 in Denver, Colorado.All three hearings were well-attended. A transcript of the proceedingswas made available for public inspection. Following the public hearings,interested persons were allowed to submit supplementary statements anddata until the record closed on March 21, 1986. During this rulemakingprocess, MSHA received written or oral statements from all segments ofthe mining community. The Agency's final rule addresses the comments receivedand is consistent with the goals of Executive Order 12291, the RegulatoryFlexibility Act and the Paperwork Reduction Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Discussion of Final Rule</ITAG>A. General DiscussionFalls of roof, face and rib are the leading cause of injuries and deathin underground coal mines. For the years 1979-1986, there were 630 fatalitiesin underground workings of coal mines of which 294, or 47 percent, werethe result of falls of roof, face, and rib. For those same years, therewere 90,534 total injuries of which 8,415, or 9.3 percent, were due tofalls of roof, face, and rib. MSHA has determined that injuries from fallsof roof, face, and rib are over eight times as likely to be fatal as undergroundinjuries from other causes. Prevention or control of roof falls continuesto be a difficult task because of the variety of conditions encounteredin coal mines that can affect the stability of various types of strata.However, technological advancements have aided in reducing the hazardsassociated with falls of roof, face and ribs. This final rule reflectsthese advancements and requires certain measures and practices that willincrease the safety protection afforded to miners. The rule also simplifiesexisting standards and reduces paperwork requirements where possible.The final rule revises the existing standards for roof control in 30 CFRPart 75, and addresses hazards related to roof falls by establishing: (1)Safety standards for roof support that apply to all underground coal mines;and (2) requirements for a roof control plan for each mine which specifiesthe roof control practices appropriate for the unique conditions of themine. As structured in this rule, each roof control plan is subject toapproval by the appropriate MSHA District Manager, based on criteria containedin the final rule.The existing roof control standards contain extensive criteria for evaluatingand approving roof control plans which resulted in unduly complex roofcontrol plans. Although the final rule retains the roof control plan concept,it reduces the roof support practices required to be addressed in eachplan. Criteria no longer necessary are deleted and criteria that are generallyapplicable to all mines are changed to mandatory standards. When applicableto most or all mines, matters previously addressed by MSHA policy havealso been included in the final rule as mandatory standards. With thesechanges, roof control plans will be less complex.B. Section-by-Section DiscussionSection 75.200 Scope.In response to commenters, the final rule includes a scope provision whichclarifies that roof support systems installed prior to the effective dateof the new standards will not have to be changed, so long as they continueto safely control the roof, face and ribs. This provision assists in definingoperator compliance responsibilities under the new standards.Section 75.201 Definitions.The term ``automated temporary roof support (ATRS) system'' is definedin the final rule to clarify the provisions of andSection; 75.209. ATRS systemsare devices that provide temporary roof support for persons who would otherwisebe exposed to unsupported roof during the process of installing roof supports.One commenter suggested that this term be changed to ``remote mechanicalroof support,'' indicating that this more accurately describes the equipment.The term ``automated temporary roof support system'' has been used throughoutthe mining industry since the mid-1970's to distinguish between manuallyinstalled temporary supports and those temporary supports established bya machine operated from a protected location.The definition of ``pillar recovery,'' which is derived from existing andSection;75.200-11, is ``any reduction in pillar size during retreat mining.'' Somecommenters suggested that splitting pillars to gain access to an otherwiseinaccessible pillar should not be considered pillar recovery since thisactivity does not create the conditions addressed by standards governingpillar recovery. This suggested exception is not adopted in the final rulebecause it is overly broad. In some circumstances, splitting a pillar togain access to an inaccessible one does involve the danger of roof fallsintended to be addressed by the pillar recovery standards of andSection;75.207. However, MSHA recognizes that this is not always the case. Forexample, if a pillar is split in a location away from a mined-out area,it may be unnecessary to have all the breaker posts and roadside radiusposts required by the pillar recovery standards. To account for such exceptions,the pillar recovery standards allow this situation to be addressed in mineroof control plans.The proposed definition for notching is not retained since this term isnot used in the final rule.Section 75.202 Protection from falls of roof, face and ribs.The final rule retains the requirement of existing andSection; 75.200 thatpersons be protected from the hazard of falls from the roof, face or ribs.Historically, falling material from the roof, the point of extraction,and the walls of entries in coal mines has been the leading cause of fatalitiesin the industry. For clarity, the final rule applies to all ``areas wherepersons work or travel,'' replacing the existing requirement that thisprotection be afforded in all ``active underground roadways, travelwaysand working places.''One commenter suggested that the phrase ``coal or rock outbursts'' be addedto this standard because this problem can be controlled. MSHA agrees thatthe frequency and seriousness of coal or rock bursts, which are violentreleases of energy from rock or coal, can be minimized through mining methodssuch as proper pillar design or prefracturing areas before they are mined.The phrase ``coal or rock bursts'' is included in the final rule to clarifythat persons are to be protected from coal or rock bursts as well as hazardsrelated to falls of roof, face, or ribs. The more general term ``burst''has been adopted in the final rule since the term ``outbursts'' refersto eruptions of coal or rock associated with gas pressures. In coal mines,the explosive breaking of coal or rock can be related to ground pressureas well as sudden releases of gas. The term ``burst'' includes both ofthese conditions.Paragraph (b) clarifies the existing general prohibition against work ortravel under unsupported roof. The final rule specifies that this is doneonly in accordance with the new standards.One commenter recommended that the standard prohibit persons from goingbeyond permanent supports for any reason, suggesting that any languageproviding for an exception be deleted. Accident and fatality statisticscontinue to indicate that the majority of fatalities from roof, face andrib falls occur under unsupported roof and in temporarily supported areas.A primary objective of the final rule is to reduce the incidence of theseaccidents by prohibiting miner exposure to unsupported roof to the extentpossible. However, a prohibition against all exposure to unsupported roofwould be impractical since some exposure is inherent when temporary supportsare manually installed in unsupported areas.Section 75.203 Mining methods. This section establishes basic safety requirements for mining methods.Paragraphs (a), (c) and (e) of this section are derived from existing andSection;andSection;75.200-7(c) (2), 75.201 and 75.201-1 while paragraphs (b) and (d) are new.Paragraph (a) prohibits mining methods that expose persons to unusual dangersfrom falls caused by excessively wide openings or improper pillar recoveryand requires that pillar dimensions be compatible with effective controlof the roof, face and ribs and coal or rock bursts. One commenter suggestedthat the design of pillars, as well as their dimensions be referenced bythe standard. MSHA's intention is that the requirement for compatible pillardimensions include pillar design.Paragraph (b) requires that a sightline or other method of directionalcontrol be used to maintain conformance with mining projections in entries,rooms, crosscuts and pillar splits. This practice helps ensure that openingsare developed as planned and pillar dimensions are accurately maintained.The use of these controls also minimizes the possibility of unintentionallycutting into abandoned areas in the mine or adjacent mines, either of whichmay contain dangerous accumulations of gas or water.In response to commenters, the proposed phrase ``a method of directionalcontrol'' has been replaced with the phrase ``a sightline or other methodof directional control.'' The addition of the term ``sightline'' will providefor a defined means of directional control, while the standard will continueto provide flexibility for the use of other types of directional controlsthat are as effective as sightlines.Paragraph (c) requires that sidecuts be started only from areas that aresupported in accordance with the roof control plan. Starting sidecuts inareas not yet supported can unnecessarily expose miners to unsupportedroof and result in excessively wide openings which increase the potentialfor a roof fall.Several commenters stated that the proposed provision which specified thatthe area from which sidecuts are started be permanently supported wouldprohibit use of safe mining systems such as continuous-mining machineswith integral roof bolters and remote-control mining machines. These commenterssuggested that because of the variety of situations that can arise, theproposed phrase, ``permanent support'' should be replaced with the phrase``supported in accordance with the roof control plan.'' The final ruleadopts this approach to accommodate the situations where the installationof permanent supports would not be necessary before beginning a side cut.Consistent with this change, the proposal to permit ``notching'' if roofsupports would be damaged when starting a sidecut has also been deleted,since this situation will also be addressed in the roof control plan.Paragraph (d) prohibits mining into an unsupported area of active workingsof a mine, except when the area being mined into is inaccessible. Thisexception recognizes that when a fall has made an area inaccessible itmay be more hazardous to clean up and support the fall area then it wouldbe to mine around it.One commenter suggested that mining into unsupported areas be permittedwhenever necessary to facilitate ventilation, regardless of accessibilityto the unsupported area. This exception, in MSHA's view, would be too broad.The Agency's intention is to allow mining into unsupported areas only whenthese areas are inaccessible.Paragraph (e) specifies where additional roof support must be installedin openings that are wider than specified in the approved roof controlplan. The final rule requires additional supports to be installed whenthe planned width of an opening is exceeded by more than 12 inches fora distance greater than 5 feet. This approach differs from the proposedrule, which related the need for additional supports in excessively wideopenings to the spacing of permanent roof supports used in the area. Uponreconsideration, the Agency has concluded that linking the need for additionalsupports in wide openings to the spacing of permanent supports may resultin excessively wide openings in which additional supports would not berequired. The final rule reflects MSHA practice, which is to require additionalsupport when the planned width is exceeded by more than 12 inches. Thisstandard recognizes that errors occasionally occur during mining, whilerequiring excessively wide and potentially dangerous conditions to be correctedby installing additional support. The final rule is not to be interpretedto allow a general practice of mining openings wider than specified inthe roof control plan.Commenters suggested that the final rule specify the type of support tobe installed for excessively wide openings. Some recommended that onlyposts or other conventional supports be used as additional roof support,while others stated that roof bolts should be used. Experience indicatesthat either roof bolts, conventional supports or equivalent supports canbe effectively used. Therefore, the final rule specifies only that additionalroof support be installed, but does not limit the operator's method ofcompliance.Commenters also suggested that additional roof support only be requiredwhen the ``mined'' width is exceeded, so that additional supports wouldnot be required where sloughing of ribs has occurred. Due to the lack ofsupport, excessively wide openings, whether unintentionally mined or causedby deterioration, present similar hazards from roof falls. Therefore, thestandard requires that additional roof support be installed wherever excessivelywide openings exist.A provision which appeared in this section of the proposed rule would haverequired support to be installed across the openings at intersections.Commenters suggested that as a standard, this would have been too restrictive.Because the roof conditions and methods of controlling mine roofs at intersectionsvary from mine to mine, MSHA agrees that the proposed requirement for onerow of posts installed on 5-foot centers across the opening may not beappropriate for all situations. Therefore in the final rule, this provisionappears in andSection;75.222(e) as a criterion to be used in the formulationand approval of roof control plans.Section 75.204 Roof bolting.This standard is derived from existing andSection;75.202 and the existingcriteria in andSection;75.200-7, except for paragraphs (b)(2), (f)(6), and(g) which are new. The standard sets out requirements for the design, useand testing of tensioned roof bolts and nontensioned grouted roof bolts.The standard also provides measures to protect against the introductionof untested roof bolting systems or ineffective roof bolts into undergroundcoal mines.Paragraph (a) provides that when the roof bolts and accessories to be usedat a mine are of a type addressed in ASTM F432-83, ``Standard Specificationfor Roof and Rock Bolts and Accessories,'' the operator must obtain a certificationfrom the manufacturer. The certification must verify that the roof boltsand accessories were manufactured and tested in accordance with the ASTMstandards. The ASTM standards for roof bolts and accessories are consensusstandards used throughout the United States for the design of roof boltassemblies.Requiring that the operator obtain a certification from the manufacturereliminates the concern that mine operators would need to have the sameknowledge of ASTM standards as manufacturers. Compliance with the finalrule requires operators to have available for inspection a certificationfrom the manufacturer that the bolts being used in the mine meet the ASTMspecifications. This approach is consistent with the industry practiceof manufacturers routinely furnishing such certification to the mine operatorwhen requested to do so in a contract or purchase order. In addition, ASTMF432-83 specifies that the manufacturer is to provide such a certificationupon request. Interested persons may obtain ASTM F432-83 from the publisher,American Society for Testing and Materials, 1916 Race Street, Philadelphia,Pennsylvania 19103. It may also be examined at any Coal Mine Safety andHealth District or Subdistrict Office.Paragraph (b) of this standard permits the use of roof bolts and accessoriesnot addressed in ASTM F432-83, provided that they are effective. The effectivenessof alternative bolts or accessories must be demonstrated by their successfuluse under mining conditions similar to those where these bolts or accessoriesare to be used, or by their installation in a representative area of themine under controlled conditions. Testing must be conducted in an areawith conditions that are representative of those where the materials areexpected to be used. Until testing demonstrates the effectiveness of thesematerials, access to the area must be controlled to permit entry only bythose persons necessary for the testing process. This provision differsfrom the proposal which specified that roof bolts and accessories not meetingthe ASTM standard could be used only if approved by the District Manager.Instead of this approach, the final rule more clearly reflects MSHA's intentionthat all roof bolts and accessories be tested, evaluated, and proven tobe effective for the prevailing geological conditions in the mine beforethey can be used.Several commenters suggested that roof bolts and accessories not addressedin the ASTM standards be prohibited, stating that no exception should bemade to the requirement that roof bolts be manufactured in accordance withthe ASTM standards. An important objective of the final rule is to assurethe quality and effectiveness of roof bolts. Consistent with this objective,as technology evolves the standard will allow for the use of materialswhich have been proven to be reliable and effective in controlling themine roof. The final rule serves this purpose by maintaining flexibilityfor the introduction of improvements that can enhance miner safety.Paragraph (c) requires that bearing plates be used with all roof bolts.MSHA experience indicates that bearing plates installed firmly againstthe roof or other bearing material are necessary to adequately supportthe roof when roof bolts are used in underground coal mines. Some commenterssuggested that bearing plates not be required for grouted bolting systemsand roof trusses because they are unnecessary. However, data gathered byMSHA and the Bureau of Mines, U.S. Department of the Interior, indicatethat bearing plates are necessary to fully utilize the support capabilitiesof both tensioned and grouted roof bolts. While roof trusses do not utilizethe normal donut, bell or embossed types of bearing plate, a truss bracket,which serves as a bearing plate, is used with these systems and would meetthe requirements of this standard.The final rule also addresses bearing plate size according to use. Whenbearing plates are used directly against the mine roof they must be atleast 6 inches square or the equivalent. However, bearing plates 5 inchessquare or the equivalent are permitted under the final rule where the roofis firm and not susceptible to sloughing. When used with wood or metal,bearing plates at least 4 inches square or the equivalent are required.Experience indicates that 6-inch square bearing plates are necessary toprovide sufficient load bearing surface in areas where the roof is susceptibleto sloughing. The exception allowing the use of 5-inch square bearing plateshas been added to the final rule in response to commenters who stated thatsuch bearing plates are being successfully used throughout the industrywhere roof conditions permit. Bearing plates 4-inch square have provedto be effective when used in conjunction with wood or metal materials whichassist in distribution of the load on roof bolts.The final rule also specifies that when wooden materials are used betweenthe bearing plate and the mine roof, and the areas to be supported havea life expectancy of 3 years or more, the wood must be treated to minimizedeterioration. This provision, which is derived from an existing criterion,has been included in the final rule as a mandatory provision. Commenterspointed out that untreated wooden materials used in long term use entriescan deteriorate and cause a loss of roof support.Paragraph (d) requires that washers, when used, conform to the shape ofthe roof bolt head and bearing plate. When washers do not conform to theshape of the roof bolt head and the bearing plate, the proper torque-tensionrelationship cannot be consistently obtained.One commenter suggested that washers should be required to be used withall roof bolts. MSHA's experience indicates that washers are not necessaryin all cases. For example, washers would not improve the performance ofmost grouted roof bolts nor the performance of bolts used with a bearingplate having a hole of one inch diameter or less.Paragraph (e) requires the diameter of finishing bits to be within a toleranceof plus or minus 0.030 inch of the manufacturer's recommended hole diameterfor the anchor used. This final rule adds a minus margin to the existingtolerance permitted for these bits, and makes the existing criterion amandatory standard. Studies have shown that roof bolt anchorage is soundwithin these tolerances.Some commenters stated that the lower tolerance for roof bolt hole diametersneed not be addressed by these standards. However, an undersized hole canprevent proper setting of an expansion shell. In addition, the pressuregenerated by roof bolting machines can force a roof bolt into an undersizedhole, leading to possible damage of the anchor.Several commenters suggested that the standard for roof bolt hole diametertolerance not be applicable to resin-grouted bolting systems. These commentersindicated that tolerances are critical for mechanically anchored systemsbut not resin-grouted bolting systems. Although not as essential, holediameter tolerances are important for resin-grouted bolts. For example,too large a hole can result in an insufficient amount of grouting materialaround the bolt and, consequently, an inadequate bond. Too small a holewould have the same result since there would be inadequate space for thegrouting material.In response to commenters, the final rule uses the phrase ``manufacturer'srecommended hole diameter'' to clarify the phrase ``required hole diameter'which was used in the proposal.This section also requires that finishing bits be distinguishable fromother roof drill bits when separate finishing bits are used. Existing criterionin andSection; 75.200-7(b)(1) provides that finishing bits should be ``easilyidentifiable by sight or feel.'' The final rule, however, emphasizes theperformance objective of the standard rather than requiring a specifictype of design for compliance.Paragraph (f)(1) requires tensioned roof bolts to be at least 30 incheslong when they are used to provide support by creating a beam of laminatedstrata. The final rule reflects experience which indicates that for a beamof laminated strata to be effective for roof support, the beam needs tobe at least 30 inches thick. This standard also requires roof bolts thatprovide support by suspending the roof from overlying stronger strata toanchor at least 12 inches into the stronger strata.One commenter suggested that all roof bolts be required to be at least36 inches long. While roof bolts at least 36 inches long may be necessaryin some cases, proper beam thickness and secure anchorage to overlyingstrata can be achieved with roof bolts that are less than 36 inches. Boltlengths for each mine will be established in the roof control plan.Paragraph (f)(2) specifies requirements for testing overlying roof stratawhen tensioned roof bolts are installed. The requirement for test holesto be drilled above the anchorage horizon provides a means of identifyingchanges in the overlying strata that may affect roof bolt anchorage. Inresponse to commenters, and to clarify the Agency's intention, this sectionhas been changed from the proposal to clearly indicate that this requirementfor test holes applies only to mechanically-anchored tensioned bolts andthat roof bolts may be installed in the test holes. Mechanically anchoredbolts have an expansion shell at or near the bolt top which, when the boltis turned, expands to anchor into surrounding strata, permitting the boltto be tightened and thus binding the roof strata together. If the strataaround the shell is soft, the support effects are lost. However, with resin-typebolts the length of the bolt is bound to the various layers of roof strataby the resin mix. Thus, the competency of the strata at the top of thebolt is less important.The proposal would have required a test hole to be drilled in each boltingcycle. However, the depth of a cycle varies with the mining system. Forexample, the roof bolting cycle for conventional mining systems normallyprogresses for about 10 feet while mining systems using continuous miningmachines with integral roof bolters may have bolting cycles which progressfor 100 feet or more. To be responsive to these variations, the intervalbetween test holes is required by the final rule to be addressed in eachmine's roof control plan. Consistent with this approach, a provision hasbeen added to the roof control plan information provisions which requiresspecification of the interval between test holes.Some commenters suggested that test holes be conspicuously marked to assurethat they have been drilled. The purpose of drilling test holes is to determinethe competency of the strata. Once this has been accomplished, no additionalsafety benefit is gained from marking these holes.Paragraph (f)(3) specifies performance standards for the installed torqueor tension range of tensioned bolts. This standard requires that, as specifiedin the roof control plan, the installed torque or tension range for boltsmust maintain the integrity of the support system and not exceed the yieldpoint of the bolt or the anchorage capacity of the strata. The effectivenessof tensioned roof bolting systems is dependent upon maintaining the tensionon the bolts within the proper range.Paragraphs (f)(3) and (4) use the terms ``torque'' and ``tension'' whenreferring to installation ranges and integrity measurements. The additionof the word ``tension'' permits the use of tension-indicating devices insteadof torquing devices to evaluate the integrity of the installation. Thischange also allows for the use of devices resulting from technologicaladvancements in measuring the integrity of roof bolt installations.Paragraph (f)(4) provides procedures for measuring the actual torque ortension on tensioned bolts installed during each roof bolting cycle. Thisstandard requires that the first roof bolt installed and one out of everyfour bolts installed thereafter be measured immediately after installation.The final rule also clarifies that these intervals are independently applicableto each boom on a roof bolting machine. This provision addresses the needto assure that, for each drilled head in use, roof bolts are installedwith proper torque or tension. The two primary causes of failure to achieveproper torque or tension on tensioned roof bolts are changes in overlyingstrata and improperly adjusted roof bolting machines. Taking measurementson these bolts and drilling test holes during each roof bolting cycle providesthe sampling necessary to detect changes in geological conditions or inadjustments to roof bolting machines.When the specified torque or tension range for tensioned roof bolts isnot achieved, corrective action is required by the final rule. This revisesthe existing criterion which provides for ``supplemental support'' to beinstalled when the specified torque range is not achieved, recognizingthat, for example, repairs or adjustments to roof bolting equipment mayalso be the action necessary to correct the problem. Corrective actionincludes adjustment or replacement of bolts with improper torque or tension,changes or adjustments to the roof bolting equipment, using different lengthbolts or using other roof support systems. The final rule deletes the existing criterion calling for particular typesof torque wrenches to be used for the measurement of roof bolt torque,and retains the proposed requirement that the actual torque or tensionon tensioned roof bolts be measured. This results in a more performance-orientedstandard and allows for the introduction of new technology in this area.Consistent with this approach, the final rule also deletes the existingcriterion which provides that a torque wrench should be on each roof boltingmachine. Several commenters suggested that torque wrenches be requiredto measure torque, and that they be supplied on each roof bolting machineso that they are readily available. The concern of these commenters wasthat the right tool be available for testing the torque of roof bolts.As noted above, MSHA believes that the final rule should not inhibit theuse of any effective method for evaluating roof bolt torque or tension,which may be something other than a torque wrench. For example, the Agencyis aware that devices now exist which can be installed with tensioned roofbolts and provide a constant read-out of the tension on the bolts. Thus,instead of specifying a tool for evaluating the torque or tension on bolts,the final rule requires torque or tension to be measured, permitting themine operator to determine the most effective method, the type of equipmentto be used, and the storage location. One commenter suggested that a provision be added which would require damagedor dislodged roof bolts to be replaced before any work or travel is permittedin the affected area. When roof bolts are damaged or dislodged, the surroundingroof is no longer supported. Thus, the concern of this commenter is addressedby andSection; 75.202(b), which prohibits persons from traveling in unsupportedareas. In addition, andSection; 75.211(c) requires that hazardous conditionsbe corrected, or that each entrance to such area be posted with a warningor a physical barrier installed. The final rule also deletes the existing criterion which provides thata ``qualified person designated by the operator'' should perform roof bolttorque measurements. Under MSHA standard 30 CFR 48.7, miners who are assignedto new tasks are required to be instructed in the safety and health aspectsof the job, including safe work procedures. Paragraph (f)(5) requires the actual torque or tension on mechanicallyanchored tensioned roof bolts to be periodically measured in advancingsections from the outby corner of the last open crosscut to the face. Thesemeasurements are required to be made at least once during each 24-hourperiod in which coal is mined in these places. For example, if coal ismined in only 2 of 6 working places on a section during a 24-hour period,these measurements would be required only in the places where coal is mined.The standard also requires ``corrective action'' to be taken when the majorityof bolts tested are not within the specified torque or tension range. Correctiveaction would include installing supplemental supports such as additionalroof bolts, crossbars, cribs or posts, or prohibiting persons from workingor traveling in the affected area. Several commenters suggested deletion of this requirement, stating thatsince the distribution of mine stresses change continually without adverselyaffecting the support system, subsequent torque or tension measurementsare not necessary. MSHA agrees that changes in the distribution of minestresses continually occur, particularly beyond the last open crosscutwhere mining is being conducted. While these changes do not always adverselyaffect the roof bolting system, such changes can result in excessive loadingof the bolts. In addition, the strata at the anchorage horizon of the boltscould be weak, which can cause the bolts to lose torque or tension. Subsequenttorque or tension measurements provide a means for determining if roofbolts are maintaining adequate torque or tension and whether changes inthe distribution of mine stresses have adversely affected the support systems.The final rule replaces the recordkeeping provision in the existing criterionwith a requirement that the operator or a person designated by the operatorcertify by signature and date that subsequent torque or tension measurementshave been made. These certifications should be made within a reasonabletime after the measurements have been completed. As proposed, certificationsmust be maintained for one year and must be made available to the representativesof the miners as well as authorized representatives of the Secretary.One commenter was concerned that persons employed by the mine operatorcould not certify that the subsequent measurements have been made sincethe proposed provision only mentioned the mine operator. In response tothis commenter and to clarify MSHA's intention, the final rule specifiesthat the mine operator or a person designated by the operator must makethe certifications required by this section.Paragraph (f)(7) prohibits tensioned roof bolts, installed as roof support,from being used to anchor trailing cables or for any other purpose thatwill place a sudden load on the bolts. Under these conditions, roof boltscan lose support capacity through vibration and other stress effects.In response to commenters, and to clarify this standard, the preamble languageused in the proposed rule to identify the types of devices that could beinstalled on roof bolts without affecting the torque or tension have beenincluded in the final rule. MSHA recognizes that hanging trailing cables,line brattice, telephone lines, or other similar devices, which do notplace sudden loads on bolts, should not be prohibited by the final rule.Paragraph (f)(8) requires angle compensating devices to be used with tensionedroof bolts when these bolts are installed at angles greater than 5 degreesfrom the perpendicular to the bearing plate. Without the use of a compensatingdevice under these conditions, the roof bolt head is stressed and failurecould occur.The final rule is changed from the proposal, which referred to angle compensatingdevices being used with bolts that are installed at angles greater than5 degrees from the ``perpendicular to the roof line.'' Commenters pointedout that the relationship of the roof bolt to the bearing plate, and notthe roof line is the relevant consideration. The final rule also deletesthe specific types of angle compensating devices which are identified inthe existing criterion. Instead, the final rule emphasizes the result required,specifying that the device compensate for the angle at which the bolt isinstalled.Paragraph (g) establishes requirements for testing the integrity of installednon-tensioned grouted roof bolts, specifying that a test be conducted onthe first bolt in each bolting cycle to determine if the installed boltcan withstand 150 foot-pounds of torque. The final rule permits this tobe done immediately after the first row of bolts is installed or, as suggestedby commenters, during installation of the first row. The standard alsorequires that corrective action be taken if the grouting material of thesebolts has not created a sufficient bond to withstand the specified torque.Corrective action would include making adjustments to the quantity or qualityof grouting material being used, assuring that the method of installationis proper, or use of a different type of support system.The existing criterion for spot roof bolting is deleted by the final rulebecause andSection; 75.204 of the final rule addresses all roof bolting applications,including spot bolting.Section 75.205 Installation of roof support using mining machines withintegral roof bolter.This standard, which is derived from existing andSection; 75.200-12(b), establishesrequirements for the installation and spacing of roof supports when usingmining machines with integral roof bolters. It requires that crossbarsor planks be used when roof bolts are installed more than 8 feet apart,and prohibits the installation of bolts greater than 10 feet apart. Thesedistances are unchanged from the proposal and in MSHA's experience, havebeen effective in supporting the roof in areas where continuous miningmachines with integral bolters are used. If the particular conditions ata mine are such that installing roof bolts on the spacings specified inthis section of the final rule would be inadequate to maintain roof control,the District Manager is authorized through the plan approval process torequire that roof bolts be installed closer together.Provisions in this section of the proposal which addressed natural roofsupport (arched roof) have been deleted. As stated in the proposal, thismethod of roof control has been discontinued in the mining industry.Section 75.206 Conventional roof support.The standards in this section are derived from existing criteria in andSection;75.200-8, except paragraphs (c) and (d) which are new. The standards addressthe use of conventional roof support, which includes the use of supportmaterials such as wood or metal posts, beams, crossbars and planks.Several commenters recommended that conventional roof support be prohibitedas the sole means of roof support and that ``full roof bolting'' be requiredin all mines. These commenters suggested that conventional support shouldbe permitted only as additional support in conjunction with roof boltingsystems. They maintained that conventional roof support methods are outdated,can be unsafe, and that technology is available to provide full roof boltsupport in all mines. These commenters also referred to accidents whichthey linked to the use of conventional support systems. In contrast, othercommenters stated that conventional supports can be used safely and thata requirement for roof bolting as the primary means of support in all mineswould eliminate some mining methods which have been used safely.The final rule permits the use of conventional support and establishessafety standards which apply when conventional supports are used as thesole means of support. Under certain mining conditions, conventional supportsystems, when properly used, are safe and effective. Also, due to the variouscompositions of roof strata encountered in underground coal mines, no singlesupport system is appropriate for all mines. For example, where the strataaffords little anchorage capacity or where the support of massive stratais not effected by the tensile properties of roof bolts, roof bolting maybe neither practical nor functional. Under these circumstances, conventionalroof support systems provide a safe alternative.However, as stated in the proposal, the use of conventional roof supportas the only means of support should have limited application in the coalmining industry today. Roof bolting systems which provide full overheadsupport and allow the use of large and more productive mining equipmentare being used safely in mines with a wide variety of roof conditions.Paragraph (a) of the final rule contains standards for the use of conventionalsupports as the sole means of support. These standards, derived from existingcriteria, set minimum requirements for the width of entries and roadways,as well as the spacing of supports. Under the final rule, the width ofall openings must be limited to 20 feet and the spacing of roadway supportsis not permitted to exceed 5 feet. Where full overhead support is used,such as beams or crossbars, straight roadways can be no wider than 16 feet,and must be limited to 14 feet wide where supports such as posts or jacksare used. Curved roadways are not permitted to exceed 16 feet wide, regardlessof the type of conventional support used. In the face area, conventionalsupports must be set within 5 feet of the uncut face. This will provideopenings and roadway widths that afford safety to miners by maintainingroof stability and also allow sufficient space to maneuver mining equipmentso that the occurrence of supports being inadvertantly knocked out is minimized.Paragraphs (a) (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section were included in theproposal as criteria provisions. Upon further consideration MSHA has determinedthat these provisions are generally applicable at all mines that use conventionalsupports as the only means of roof support and should be included in thefinal rule as standards. However, if the particular conditions at a mineare such that maintaining the widths of openings and roadways and the spacingof supports consistent with paragraph (a) of this section would be inadequateto maintain roof control, the District Manager is authorized through theapproval process to require the width of openings and roadways and thespacing of supports to be less than specified in this standard.The requirement that width of openings be limited to 20 feet wide whenusing only conventional supports is derived from the existing criterionin andSection; 75.200-8. The proposal would have deleted this, but retainedthe related existing criterion in andSection; 75.200-9, which provides thatany place driven over 20 feet wide should be supported by a combinationof conventional supports and roof bolts.When conventional supports are used as the sole means of support, a spanof roof corresponding to the width of road-ways is left with no overheadsupports. When a combination of conventional supports and roof bolts isused, bolts are installed in the roof over the roadways, providing overheadsupport.Wider openings inherently create greater stresses on the roof span, whichcan cause roof separation or shearing along the ribs, possibly leadingto failure of the roof. When openings are maintained no wider than 20 feet,conventional supports can, in favorable conditions, provide adequate support.For openings wider than 20 feet, however, MSHA has concluded that a combinationof roof bolts and conventional supports is necessary for reliable roofcontrol. A survey conducted by MSHA indicates that 71 working sectionsare currently mining openings more than 20 feet wide with conventionalsupports as the only means of roof support. To continue mining in thisfashion, roof bolts must be used in conjunction with the conventional supports.The requirement that supports be installed to within 5 feet of the uncutface will assure that supports are installed as close as practicable tothe face before further roof is exposed by the mining process.The final rule also retains the proposed provision that each opening alonga travelway be supported by extending the line of supports across openingswhen they are no longer needed for storing supplies or for equipment totravel into the area. This minimizes the potential for a roof fall at theintersection of entries, rooms and crosscuts.Paragraph (b) sets forth specifications for conventional roof support materials,which are retained from the proposal. Paragraph (b)(1) specifies the sizerequirements for posts, addressing the diameter of round posts and thecross-sectional area of split posts as a function of their length. Forpurposes of clarity, these requirements are set forth in a table. The finalrule revises the specifications in existing criteria to make the supportcapacity for posts of varying lengths more equivalent, particularly thoseused in higher coal seams. For example, an existing criterion specifiesthat the diameter of posts be increased 1 inch for each 15 inches of length.However, with this approach, posts used in a 12-foot coal seam would berequired to have a support capacity approximately six times that of postsused in a 5-foot seam. Therefore, the final rule specifies more equal supportcapacity for posts longer than 60 inches by requiring the diameter to beincreased 1 inch for each 24 inches of length greater than 60 inches.One commenter suggested that split posts be prohibited, except for useas breaker posts. This commenter indicated that split posts do not providethe same support as round posts. The strength of a support post is influencedby the integrity of the material, its cross-sectional area, and its length.Each of these factors is addressed in the final rule. The cross-sectionalarea requirements for split posts are derived from the cross-sectionalarea of round posts of the same length.Paragraph (b)(2) sets out dimensions for wooden cap blocks, footings, crossbarsand planks. This standard requires that each wooden cap block and footinghave flat sides and be at least 2 inches thick, 4 inches wide and 12 incheslong. The existing criteria section calling for cap blocks to have flatparallel sides is deleted by the final rule, recognizing that flat sidesare the important feature of these materials to be effective for use asheaders and footers. In addition, paragraph (e) of this section requiresthat posts and jacks be tightly installed on solid footing.One commenter suggested that cap blocks and footings be required to havea width which is at least equal to the diameter of the post being usedin order to take better advantage of the load bearing capacity of eachpost. The final rule does not adopt this comment. Under the final rule,cap blocks and footings are required to be at least 4 inches wide, whichis the smallest diameter of the post that may be used for support. However,when a minimum post diameter is ordered, various larger diameter postsare frequently provided, some of which may exceed the size of the cap blocksand footings to be used. This variation would make the suggested revisionimpractical. In addition, the rule provides for substantial bearing surfaceby requiring cap blocks and footers to be at least 12 inches long.Under the final rule, crossbars are required to have a minimum cross-sectionalarea of 24 square inches and be at least 3 inches thick. Planks used forroof support must have a minimum width of six inches and be at least 1inch thick. The existing criterion, which specifies that a plank shouldhave a minimum cross-sectional area of 8 square inches, is revised by thefinal rule to a minimum width of 6 inches. A minimum width of 6 inchesprovides a bearing surface for planks which are normally used to controlsloughing type roof conditions and recognizes that 2&quot; x 4&quot; lumber shouldnot be used as a plank.One commenter suggested that planks be at least 2 inches thick becausethey are normally used in roof fall areas in conjunction with crossbarsto form a canopy to protect against roof and rib sloughing. Although planksmay be used in conjunction with crossbars, MSHA's experience indicatesthat planks are more commonly used in conjunction with roof bolts to assistin the control of sloughing. Planks that are at least 1 inch thick havebeen successfully used for this purpose.The final rule deletes the criterion in existing andSection; 75.200-8(a)(5),which specifies that cribs be made with wood having parallel flat sidesand that cribs be not less than 30 inches square. Paragraph (b)(3) of thefinal rule replaces this criterion with the requirement that cribbing materialshave at least two parallel flat sides. Parallel flat sides are importantto cribbing materials since these support structures are built by stackingthese materials. No crib dimensions, however, are specified because thiscould prevent the use of cribbing materials in confined areas where theymay have application.One commenter suggested that crib materials need to be at least 6 inchesthick and 6 inches wide to provide sufficient support. The final rule doesnot include this suggestion. Cribs are commonly used where roof controlis difficult and inadequate materials would fail and need to be replaced.Under the existing standards, dimensions for crib blocks are chosen bythe operator consistent with the conditions under which they will be used.MSHA has not experienced problems with this approach.Paragraph (c) allows the use of two or more posts set in a cluster if theirtotal strength meets that required by paragraph (b)(1) for a single postof the same length. This provision is intended to allow a number of poststo be used together, rather than requiring that wider posts be orderedwhen mining heights vary. In response to commenters and for clarity, thefinal rule includes minimum dimensions for posts used in a cluster. MSHAexperience indicates that posts narrower than those permitted by the finalrule are subject to buckling and that installing the number of such narrowposts necessary to provide equivalent strength would be impractical.Paragraph (d) allows the use of materials other than wood for conventionalroof support if these materials are at least as strong as wood. Cribbingmaterials and other supports made from non-wood materials which providesupport capacity equal to wood are currently available. For example, concretecrib blocks and fiberglass beams have been successfully used as conventionalsupport materials.Paragraphs (e) through (g) specify requirements for the firm installationof posts, spacing of blocks used for lagging between the roof and crossbars,and jacks used for roof support.Several commenters suggested that the final rule include a requirementthat a maximum of two wedges be used with each post to produce a tightfit of posts between the mine bottom and roof. These commenters indicatedthat such a requirement would avoid stacking wedges over posts which aretoo short and provide for secure installations. MSHA agrees that excessiveuse of wedges can result in unstable posts. However, uneven roof conditionsor other irregularities may require additional wedges to properly installa post. For this reason, the final rule does not specify a maximum numberof wedges that can be used, but instead specifies that each post be tightlyinstalled.Paragraph (h) requires jacks set for roof support to be used with at least36 square inches of roof bearing surface. Several commenters suggestedthat the bearing surface for jacks be reduced to 25 square inches in orderto be consistent with the bearing surface for roof bolt bearing platesthat are 5 inches square. MSHA believes that 36 square inches is appropriatebecause jacks are used and reused under varying conditions and can exertheavy loads against the roof due to mechanical leverage. Other commenterssuggested that the bearing surface be slip resistant. When properly set,jacks exert pressure that is sufficient to maintain placement due to thefriction between the mine bottom and roof and the bearing surfaces of thejack.The final rule deletes existing andSection; 75.202 which requires that dislodgedsupports be replaced promptly. Several commenters indicated that replacementof dislodged supports is not immediately necessary in all areas of a mine.Instead, replacement should depend on the area of the mine affected. MSHAagrees that an area not being used for work or travel need not be a highpriority for replacement of support. The hazards associated with dislodgedsupports are addressed by andSection; 75.202(b), which prohibits personsfrom traveling in unsupported areas, and andSection;75.211(c) which requiresthat hazardous conditions be corrected, or a warning posted or barrierinstalled to impede travel into the area.Section 75.207 Pillar recovery. This final rule is derived from existing andSection;75.201-2 and existingcriteria in andSection;75.200-11. It establishes safety standards for theextraction of pillars during retreat mining. In the proposal, MSHA included as standards, existing criteria that wereconsidered applicable to all mines. Several commenters stated that whilethese provisions would be applicable most of the time, there are situationswhen they would not be appropriate. For example, remote control continuous-miningmachines and mobile roof support systems may eliminate the need for installationof some breaker posts, which would reduce miner exposure to roof fall hazardswhile installing such supports. To provide flexibility and to address thesesituations, a provision has been added to the final rule that permits alternativemethods to be addressed through the roof control plan process. Paragraph (a) prohibits conducting full and partial pillar recovery onthe same pillar line, except where physical conditions such as unstablefloor or roof, falls of roof, oil and gas well barriers or surface subsidencerequire that pillars be left in place. Full and partial pillar recoveryon the same pillar line can create conditions which cause roof pressuresto override into active working places. However, situations can occur duringfull pillar recovery which require some pillars or parts of pillars tobe left intact for safety reasons. The final rule recognizes these circumstances,but prohibits a general practice of full and partial pillar recovery onthe same pillar line. Paragraph (b) requires that at least two rows of breaker posts or equivalentmeans of support be installed as close to the initial breakline as practicableand across each opening leading into an area where full or partial pillarextraction has been completed. Breaker posts are used to prevent a rooffall in a mined-out area from continuing into an area where miners workor travel. Several commenters suggested that the proposed requirement for breakerposts across each opening leading to an area where pillar extraction hasbeen completed be deleted because these areas would be addressed by therequirement that breaker posts be set as close to the intended breaklineas practicable. MSHA's intention is that these provisions be applicablein two different situations. The first is that breaker posts be installedas close as practicable to the initial intended breakline after developmentof the section has been completed and before any recovery work has started.The second is that breaker posts be installed across each opening leadinginto an area where pillar recovery has been completed. The term ``initial''has been added to the phrase ``intended breakline'' to clarify that thisprovision is applicable before any pillars have been extracted. This standard also requires that a row of roadside-radius (turn) postsor equivalent support be installed leading into any split or lift of apillar prior to the start of mining. Roadside-radius posts reduce the widthof the roadway. Several commenters suggested that mobile roof support (MRS) systems areavailable and should be used as breaker posts rather than requiring theminers to manually set the breaker posts. The MRS system is currently beingdeveloped by the Bureau of Mines, U.S. Department of the Interior. Preliminaryresults obtained from experiments conducted in mines where the seam heightswere between 7 and 15 feet indicate that the MRS system may have positiveapplication in higher coal seams. However, this project is still in thedevelopmental stage, and research is still being conducted by the Bureau.For these reasons, the final rule does not require the use of these devicesat this time. Paragraph (c) requires at least two rows of posts, or equivalent support,to be set on each side of the roadway on not more than 4-foot centers,and permits only one open roadway not more than 16 feet wide from the solidpillars to a final stump. A provision has been added to this section ofthe final rule which limits the roadway width to the final stump to 14feet where posts are used as the only means of support. This provisionis consistent with andSection;75.206(a)(4), which limits the width of roadwaysto 14 feet when posts are used. However, a 16-foot roadway could be usedwhere cross bars or other means of overhead support are used in conjunctionwith posts. The ``final stump,'' sometimes referred to as a ``pushout,''is the last portion of a pillar providing roof support. When it is removed,the possibility of a roof fall is greatly increased. Paragraph (d) sets out requirements for open-end pillar extraction. Open-endpillar extraction is mining a pillar when no portion of the pillar is leftbetween the mined-out area and the section of the pillar being mined. Underthe final rule, the width of the roadway is not permitted to exceed 16feet and at least two rows of breaker posts on 4-foot centers or equivalentsupport must be installed between the lift to be started and the area wherepillars have been extracted. The breaker posts or equivalent support mustbe maintained to within 7 feet of the face. Where open-end pillar recoveryis conducted, these are the only means of support between the mined-outarea and the persons extracting the pillar. Several commenters suggested that open-end pillar extraction be prohibitedbecause this method is outdated and presents too great a hazard for miners.Open-end pillaring has been done safely and effectively in some mines whereproper procedures are used. Therefore, the final rule continues to recognizethis mining method. As proposed, existing standard andSection;75.201-2(h), which addresses recoveryof adjacent pillars left and right from the same opening, is deleted bythe final rule. Under the final rule, this element of pillar mining wouldbe addressed in each mine's roof control plan in which the operator isrequired to address the sequence of mining pillars. Section 75.208 Warning devices. This standard, which is new, requires that areas where permanent supportends be identified to minimize the risk of miners unintentionally goinginto unsupported areas. In the mine environment, the location where permanentsupport ends is often difficult to detect. Therefore, under the final rule,the end of permanent support must be marked with a readily visible warningor, alternatively, a physical barrier installed to impede passage intoareas where the roof is unsupported. A visible warning could include reflectivedevices hung, for example, on the last row of roof bolts or other permanentroof support. A barrier could be constructed of posts across the entryat the end of permanent roof support. In response to commenters, the phrase ``except during the installationof roof supports'' has been added to the final rule to clarify that thisstandard is not applicable during the installation of roof supports. Personsinstalling supports would normally be aware of where the permanent supportshave been installed and are working to advance the support system. Theproposal that the end of permanent support be ``conspicuously identified''has been changed to ``posted with a readily visible warning'' in the finalrule to more clearly state MSHA's intention that the device be readilyseen in the mine atmosphere. A commenter suggested that this standard require a reflective marker anda physical barrier, stating that both methods are necessary to preventminers from unintentionally entering unsupported areas. The commenter alsopointed out that the cost of installing both methods would be minimal comparedto the protection they would provide to miners. The purpose of this requirementis to provide a means of warning persons when they are approaching an areathat is not supported so that they do not inadvertently travel into theunsupported area. The Agency believes that this can be accomplished byeither a visible warning or a physical barrier. A requirement that allmarkers have a reflective surface could prohibit other effective methodsthat will provide the necessary warning. Several commenters suggested that a provision be added to the final rulerequiring devices to be installed that would monitor and signal movementof the mine roof. These commenters stated that roof movement indicatorsare currently available and that their regular use could save miners' lives.Roof movement indicators give a signal when the roof moves more than theamount to which the device is set to respond. The objective is to set thedevice to detect roof movement that indicates an impending fall, as distinguishedfrom normal roof movements. The final rule does not require the use of roof movement indicators. Asdiscussed in the proposal, MSHA has followed the development of these devicesand believes that roof movement indicators can measure roof sag with reasonableaccuracy. However, at their current stage of development, the Agency doesnot believe that these devices can reliably forecast the failure of mineroof. Roof conditions vary substantially from mine to mine, and in manycases, from section-to-section within the same mine. Some roof strata cansag considerably while remaining stable and supported. Other roof stratawill sag only a fraction of an inch before falling. The Bureau of Mines, U.S. Department of the Interior, has designed an experimentalultrasonic distance-measuring device that measures roof and floor convergence,as well as the convergence rate. Laboratory tests conducted on these devicesunder controlled conditions indicate that they can reliably measure differencesin the distance between the mine floor and roof. However, when field testedat two underground mines, some instability in the readings were observed.Most of the errors were traced to heavy equipment vibrations, temperaturevariations, and changes in ventilation. This experience indicates thatfurther research is needed to address these problems, as well as the problemof determining how much roof sag is indicative of a roof failure.Section 75.209 Automated Temporary Roof Support (ATRS) systems. This new provision requires the use of automated temporary roof support(ATRS) systems with roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machinesequipped with integral bolters. The purpose of these safety devices isto protect persons from roof falls when installing roof bolts in workingsections. Under the final rule, ATRS systems are required to be used with all newroof bolting equipment ordered after March 28, 1988, regardless of themining height in which the equipment will be operated. The standard alsorequires existing roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machineswith integral roof bolters being operated in mining heights of 30 inchesor more to be used with ATRS systems in accordance with a graduated complianceschedule. Roof bolting equipment being operated in working sections wherethe mining height is 36 inches or more must be provided with ATRS systemsby March 28, 1989 and roof bolting equipment being operated in mining heightsbelow 36 inches to 30 inches must be provided with ATRS systems by March28, 1990. After this date, the use of ATRS systems with existing roof boltingequipment in mining heights below 30 inches must be addressed in the roofcontrol plan on a mine-to-mine basis. Mining height will be measured from the mine floor to the mine roof, withoutregard to roof support materials. Measurements to establish mining heightwill be made only in areas where good mining practices have been followed.As stated throughout this rulemaking, a primary objective of the finalrule is to minimize hazards associated with persons working beyond permanentlysupported roof during the installation of supports. Roof falls are theleading cause of fatalities in underground coal mines. These accidentsmost frequently occur near the face area where coal is extracted and ofteninvolve activities related to the installation of roof supports. The use of ATRS systems should significantly reduce the number of fatalitiesand injuries that occur when miners work or travel beyond permanently supportedroof. However, ATRS systems will not produce optimum effectiveness unlesstraining programs continue to emphasize the importance of remaining undersupported roof at all times. MSHA accident records show that in 1985 and1986 five fatalities occurred when miners advanced beyond the ATRS intoareas where the roof was unsupported. As the use of ATRS systems grows,it is essential that miners be properly trained in accordance with theprovisions of 30 CFR Part 48, to work or travel only within the areas beingprotected by ATRS systems. Through the combined efforts of the mining community, a variety of ATRSsystems has been developed for use in underground coal mines over the pastdecade. As a result, a large number of these devices are in use today.MSHA estimates that nearly 74 percent of roof bolting machines, which includesalmost all continuous miners with integral roof bolters, are currentlyequipped with an ATRS system. ATRS systems typically are mounted on roof bolting machines and continuous-miningmachines with integral roof bolting equipment. Some ATRS system designs,however, are free-standing machines. Either type can be used to complywith the final rule, which requires ATRS systems to be used with machinesthat perform roof bolting operations. ATRS systems are usually composed of one or more hydraulically-actuatedcylinders with a bar, ring, or other support device that can be liftedand pressed against the mine roof. ATRS system controls are typically locatedso that they can be operated from under permanently supported roof. However,some existing designs require the equipment operator to be temporarilypositioned a short distance beyond the last row of permanent supports toset the ATRS. Because of this, these designs include structures to protectthe equipment operator. At the present time three States, West Virginia, Virginia and Kentucky,have requirements for the use of ATRS systems. MSHA's final rule differsfrom the Virginia and Kentucky requirements, which call for ATRS systemson all roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machines with integralroof bolters operated in mining heights of 42 inches or more. The finalrule also differs from the West Virginia standard, which requires ATRSsystems on roof bolting equipment in all mining heights, unless a waiverof compliance is granted. MSHA's final rule addresses the use of ATRS systemsin mining heights below 30 inches on a mine-by-mine basis.The proposal provided that ATRS systems be used to the extent practicableand as technology became available to protect persons working or travelingbeyond permanent roof support. Some commenters objected to this approach,stating that it was too general and that the standard should more clearlyspecify operators' compliance responsibilities. These commenters recommendedthat requirements for ATRS systems only apply during the installation ofroof bolts. In support of this, they stated that currently available ATRSsystems have been designed for use during the installation of roof boltsand have not generally been used during the installation of conventionalsupport. MSHA recognizes that ATRS systems have been designed predominantly foruse in roof bolting operations. In part, this is because ATRS systems weredeveloped as alternatives to canopies or cabs on roof bolting equipment.Under 30 CFR 75.1710, substantially constructed canopies or cabs are requiredon all self-propelled electric face equipment to protect the operatorsof these machines from roof falls. Because of the mechanical articulationnecessary in roof bolting operations, and the close proximity of the equipmentoperator to this part of the machine, devices which provide equal or greaterprotection to canopies or cabs were developed and approved under 30 CFR75.1710-1(f).\1\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Section 75.1710-1(f) provides for MSHA approval of devicesto be used in lieu of canopies or cabs on self-propelled electric faceequipment to protect equipment operators from roof falls. After reviewing existing applications for ATRS systems, the Agency hasconcluded that the adaptability of ATRS systems for use during the installationof conventional supports has not been established at this time. Therefore,the final rule specifies the use of ATRS systems in conjunction with roofbolting operations, and provides a compliance schedule for the introductionof ATRS system technology in progressively lower mining heights. MSHA willcontinue, however, to encourage the development of ATRS systems for useduring the installation of conventional supports and during installationof supports for purposes such as extending line curtain and taking gaschecks. Commenters expressed divergent views about the use of ATRS systems in variousmining heights. Some suggested that ATRS systems should be required inall mines, regardless of mining height. These commenters stated that ATRSsystems have been successfully used in mining heights of 30 inches andthat ATRS systems have been designed to work in mining heights as low as26 inches. Other commenters recommended that ATRS systems should be requiredonly where the mining height is 42 inches or more. These commenters pointedto problems with the use of ATRS systems in lower mining heights involvingclearance, obstruction of the equipment operator's vision, and difficultywith retrofitting existing machines. Adapting ATRS system technology to use in coal mines is primarily influencedby the design of the equipment with which the ATRS system is to be used,and the mining height the equipment is to be used in. For machine-mountedATRS systems, these two related factors are most readily addressed in themanufacturing stage. As roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machineswith integral bolters are built, the ATRS system can be made part of themachine, with consideration given to weight distribution, operator visibilityand other design elements. The success of this approach is illustratedby the roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machines with integralbolters built over approximately the past 11 years, the vast majority ofwhich have been designed to accommodate ATRS systems. Based on these considerations,all new roof bolting equipment and continuous-mining machines with integralroof bolters ordered after the effective date of the final rule are requiredto be used with ATRS systems. Existing roof bolting equipment and continuous-mining machines with integralbolters will also be required to be used with ATRS systems. The standard'stwo year phase-in schedule for this equipment recognizes the expandingapplication of ATRS system technology. For practical reasons, and becauseATRS systems were developed as alternatives to canopies or cabs on miningequipment, retrofitting ATRS systems to existing machines began in mineswith mine floor to mine roof measurements of 42 inches or more.\2\<NOTE/> As applications of ATRS technology improved and the benefitsof this safety equipment became known, ATRS systems have been consistentlydeveloped for a greater variety of machines and for use in lower miningheights. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ Under 30 CFR 75.1710-1, cabs or canopies have been requiredsince January 1, 1976 on self-propelled electric face equipment operatingwhere the mine floor to mine roof measurement is 42 inches or more. A recent MSHA survey shows that out of approximately 2,976 roof boltingmachines and continuous-mining machines with integral roof bolters in service,about 2,191 are equipped with ATRS systems. Of these, an estimated 380are machines that were retrofitted with ATRS systems. The majority of thisequipment operates in mining heights of 36 inches or more. Currently, 43machines which were retrofitted with ATRS systems are operating in miningheights between 30 and 36 inches, and 4 in mining heights below 30 inches.As these data indicate, today's ATRS systems technology is being appliedto equipment in lower mining heights. From this trend and Agency experiencewith ATRS systems, MSHA has concluded that current ATRS system technologycan be applied to roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machinesnow operating in mining heights of 30 inches or more. At mining heightsbelow 30 inches, experience with applying ATRS system technology to existingequipment is still limited. Several commenters stated that the the proposed 2-year compliance schedulefor the use of ATRS systems was too long and that ATRS systems standardsshould be effective no later than six months after the effective date ofthe final rule. Other commenters recommended that ATRS systems requirementsbe effective 3 years after the final rule. They indicated that a 3-yearperiod was necessary to allow mine operators to acquire ATRS systems andachieve compliance. MSHA has informally reviewed the availability of ATRS systems and foundthat currently there are eight major manufacturers of roof bolting equipmentthat make ATRS systems. Primarily, these manufacturers make ATRS systemsfor the equipment that they manufacture, including ATRS system retrofittingkits for their equipment. In addition, there are eight independent shopsof which MSHA is aware that make ATRS systems for application with a varietyof roof bolting equipment. Some coal mining companies also make their ownATRS systems. From the recent MSHA survey noted above, the Agency alsoestimates that there are 495 roof bolting machines and continuous-miningmachines with integral bolters operating in mining heights of 36 inchesor more than are not yet being used with ATRS systems. In mines with miningheights of 30 inches up to 36 inches, approximately 173 pieces of roofbolting equipment are operating without ATRS systems.Based on this information, MSHA has concluded that a one-year complianceschedule following the effective date of the final rule provides a reasonableopportunity for operators of coal mines with mining heights of 36 inchesor more to acquire ATRS systems and implement the use of these deviceswith all roof bolting machines and continous-mining machines with integralbolters. Recognizing that ATRS system technology has been applied to alesser degree in the class of roof bolting equipments used in mining heightsof 30 to 36 inches, an additional 12-month period is permitted for operatorsof these mines to achieve compliance with the ATRS system standard. Thisshould also ease the initial demand for ATRS systems. In addition, MSHA anticipates that ATRS system technology will continueto be adapted for use with existing roof bolting equipment in mining heightsbelow 30 inches. To provide for the introduction of these ATRS systemsin mines where they can be practicably used, the final rule requires operatorsof mines with mining heights below 30 inches to address the use of ATRSsystems with existing equipment in the mine roof a control plan. This aspectof the ATRS system standards will apply two years after the effective dateof the final rule. Where ATRS systems can be adapted for use with existingequipment in these low mining heights, revisions to the mine's roof controlplan will be required to specify the use of ATRS systems. In making decisionsabout whether ATRS system technology can be practicably implemented inlow mining heights the district manager will take into consideration factorssuch as mining conditions and difficulties associated with retrofitting,including machine mobility and visibility. Some exceptions to the use of ATRS systems are included in the final rule.In addition to conventional support mines, ATRS systems are not requiredby the final rule in anthracite mines because this method of mining coalis incompatible with ATRS systems. In anthracite mines, the coal is generallymined from pitching coal seams where roof is supported primarily by conventionalmethods and the use of roof bolting machines is impractical. In mines that are required to have an ATRS system, the standard also authorizesDistrict Managers to approve the use of alternative methods of temporaryroof support as part of the mine's roof control plan. Commenters pointedout that it is necessary to allow alternatives to the use of an ATRS systemwhen use of the device is unworkable. For example, in an area where a rooffall has occurred, the mine roof may be above the height capacity of theATRS system being used at the mine, even if extension devices are used.The final rule would permit alternative support measures to be includedin the mine's approved roof control plan to address such situations. The final rule also permits the use of temporary supports in conjunctionwith an ATRS system. This provision recognizes that manually set temporarysupports may be necessary to reduce the span of the unsupported roof insome circumstances. For example, when supporting a side cut it may notbe practicable to set the ATRS system within 5 feet of the rib. Here again,the final rule permits circumstances such as this to be addressed in themine's approved roof control plan. Some commenters asked whether ATRS systems provided in accordance withthis section would automatically be considered an approved alternativeto a canopy or cab. As stated in the proposal, MSHA will continue to evaluatethe use of ATRS systems as alternatives to canopies or cabs in accordancewith 30 CFR 75.1710-1(f). ATRS systems conforming with the final rule willnot be automatically approved as alternatives to the use of canopies orcabs.The final rule prescribes where miners can safely work or travel to theleft, right or beyond the support device of an ATRS system. It prohibitswork or travel to the left, right or beyond the ATRS system unless supportis provided within 5 feet of the support device of the ATRS system. Thisrequirement is derived from Agency experience with the area of supportprovided by other types of temporary and permanent support, and experiencewith ATRS systems. If the particular conditions at a mine are such thata 5-foot distance between supports would be inadequate to maintain safetyfor the miners, the District Manager is authorized through the approvalprocess to require the distance between supports to be less than 5 feet.This aspect of the final rule is unchanged from the proposal, except thatseparate standards for work or travel to the left or right of an ATRS system,and work or travel beyond the support device are consolidated into onestandard. The phrase in the proposal which stated that the coal rib isconsidered support is not included in the final rule, since it is commonlyunderstood in the industry that the coal ribs and face provide roof support.The distance an ATRS system can be set beyond the last row of support isrequired by the final rule to be addressed in the roof control plan foreach mine. Some commenters suggested the final rule specify that the distancebetween the ATRS system and the last row of installed roof bolts not exceedthe bolt spacing specified in the mine roof control plan, plus 12 inches.They stated that an additional distance of 12 inches would accommodatethe installation of bolts in the next row of the roof bolting pattern withoutany mechanical interference with the support device of the ATRS system.The distance an ATRS system is to be set beyond permanent support shouldbe the minimum that is necessary to install the next row of supports. Thisdistance will vary due to such factors as the lengthwise spacing of thesupports, the roof conditions at the mine, and mechanical interferenceof the ATRS system with equipment used to install the roof bolts in accordancewith the bolting pattern. MSHA believes that these factors can be moreappropriately addressed in the roof control plan on a mine-by-mine basis,rather than by a general standard.The final rule sets out performance features for ATRS systems which arebroad enough to accommodate a wide range of technologies. ATRS systemsare required to be capable of elastically supporting a deadweight loadthat is 450 times each square foot of roof area intended to be supported,but in no case less than 11,250 pounds. This minimum strength specificationis currently used to evaluate ATRS systems that are proposed to be usedinstead of a canopy or cab under 30 CFR 75.1710. It is derived from datagathered from fatal roof fall accident reports, which indicate that a majorityof roof fall fatalities involve rock and other material approximately 3feet thick or less. Taking this into account, the final rule requires thatan ATRS system be capable of supporting a volume of rock 3 feet thick overthe roof area intended to be supported by the ATRS system. Rock weighsapproximately 150 pounds per cubic foot, and a column of rock 1-foot squareand 3 feet thick weighs approximately 450 pounds. Applying these factorsto an ATRS system designed to support, for example, a 5x5-foot area ofroof, the ATRS system is required to elastically support a static loadof at least 11,250 pounds (5andmin172; x 5andmin172;x 3andmin172; x 150-lb/cuft).The standard requires the controls that position and set the supports ofan ATRS system to be operable from under permanently supported roof whenpositioning and setting the ATRS system. A vast majority of existing ATRSsystems are designed this way. Alternatively, the controls can be operablefrom a position beyond permanent support, so long as they are located ina compartment that provides protection for the equipment operator. Thisalternative permits the continued use of certain existing ATRS systemsthat provide overhead and lateral protection for the equipment operatorwhile at the ATRS system controls. Although this latter type of ATRS systembriefly exposes the equipment operator to unsupported roof, the Agencyhas taken into consideration the safety advantages of this type of designwhich includes protection from rib or face rolls and roof falls that mayoverride into the permanently supported area. In some cases, this designalso permits total operation of the equipment while the operator remainsin a protected compartment, affording continuous protection from roof fallsand other hazards.In response to commenters and to clarify MSHA's intention, the phrase ``equipmentoperator's entire body be protected,'' which was included in the proposal,has been changed to the phrase ``overhead and lateral protection.'' Thesecommenters stated that it would be impossible to protect the equipmentoperator's entire body since arms or legs could be extended beyond theprotection of the compartment. MSHA agrees. The purpose of this requirementis to provide overhead and lateral protection that will allow the equipmentoperator to remain within the confines of the compartment while operatingthe controls.The final rule sets a basic strength requirement for the compartment thatprotects the operator while at the ATRS system controls. The proposal,which would have required a 20,000-pound support capacity, is changed bythe final rule to require that the operator's compartment be capable ofelastically supporting a deadweight load of 18,000 pounds. This strengthfactor has proven to be effective for protecting persons under canopiesfrom significant impact loads during actual roof falls.Under the final rule, all jacks affecting the capacity of an ATRS systemor a compartment must have check valves, or equivalent protection, to preventsupport failure in the event of a sudden loss of pressure. This provisionis changed from the proposal which referred to loss of pressure in hydraulicjacks. While current ATRS systems primarily use hydraulically operatedjacks, other systems such as those pneumatically or mechanically actuatedcould be used, presenting the same hazard of support failure.The final rule specifies that, except for the main tram controls, the controlswhich position and set the ATRS system must limit the speed of the equipmentto 80 feet-per-minute. This provision addresses the potential hazards associatedwith tramming ATRS systems too quickly or abruptly into position, whichmay result in injury to the equipment operator or cause the equipment operatorto be exposed to unsupported roof. This aspect of the final rule was developedbased on underground observations and discussions with representativesof the mining community and equipment manufacturers regarding specificationsfor use of ATRS systems in lieu of canopies or cabs. A tramming speed of80 feet-per-minute is slow enough to allow the equipment to be maneuveredsafely while positioning and setting the ATRS system and yet fast enoughto facilitate the bolting or other support operation. Virtually all existingATRS systems incorporate this basic feature.The final rule retains the proposed requirement that the support capacityof an ATRS system be certified by a registered engineer. Also under thefinal rule, a compartment provided in accordance with paragraph (e)(2)(ii)is required to be certified by a registered engineer as meeting the requiredminimum structural capacity. A certification from the manufacturer's registeredengineer would constitute one method of compliance with this requirement.These certifications are required to be made available to an authorizedrepresentative of the Secretary and representatives of the miners uponrequest. This provision has been added to the final rule to clarify MSHA'sintention with respect to the availability of these certifications.A common practice for evaluating the support capability of a structureis to consult a registered engineer. The final rule incorporates this practicewith respect to the capacity of ATRS systems and compartments. The engineer'scertification provides assurance and evidence that each system and relatedcompartment meets the required structural specifications.Section 75.210 Manual installation of temporary supports.MSHA recognizes that the manual installation of temporary supports willcontinue to have application due to the variety of mining methods and miningconditions. The final, rule, therefore, includes requirements for thismethod of roof control. These standards are derived from andSection;75.200and criteria andSection;75.200-13.The final rule permits only those persons installing temporary supportsto proceed beyond the last permanent support until the supports have beeninstalled. In addition, the final rule sets out requirements for the spacingand sequence of installing temporary supports and addresses work or travelin areas that are temporarily supported.The procedures and precautions required for the manual installation oftemporary roof support are based on industry experience and are designedto minimize the exposure of persons to unsupported roof. The final rulerequires that persons manually installing temporary roof support positionthemselves between the temporary support to be set and two other sourcesof roof support. These other sources of support could be permanent supports,temporary supports already installed, or the coal face or rib. From thisposition, persons setting temporary support would be permitted to proceedup to five feet beyond supported roof to install the next support.Several commenters suggested that temporary supports be installed at armslength. Except when adverse roof conditions are present, MSHA's experienceindicates that 5 feet of space between temporary supports is generallyadequate for controlling the roof and that this spacing is compatible withthe subsequent installation of permanent roof support. The temporary roofsupport pattern should allow sufficient room for maneuvering roof supportinstallation equipment without dislodging temporary supports. The supportpattern should also permit the installation of permanent supports withoutnecessitating the removal or relocation of temporary supports, which canbe dangerous. For these reasons, the final rule retains the proposed requirementthat temporary supports, when manually installed, be set on no more than5-foot centers. However, if the particular conditions at a mine are suchthat setting temporary supports on 5-foot centers would be inadequate tomaintain roof control, the District Manager is authorized through the approvalprocess to require the supports to be set closer together.Section 75.211 Roof testing and scaling. This final rule is derived from andSection;andSection; 75.202, 75.205 and criteriain andSection; 75.200-13 regarding examination and testing of the roof, faceand ribs. It sets out requirements for making a visual examination forhazards, and conducting sound and vibration tests of the roof. The standardalso requires precautions to be taken when hazardous conditions are detected.Paragraph (a) of the standard requires a visual examination in any areawhere work is to be started and thereafter as conditions warrant. Changesin geological and atmospheric conditions can cause instability and deteriorationof the roof, face and ribs in underground mines. These examinations andtests are necessary to identify hazards that may result from such changesbefore persons work or travel in the affected areas. Paragraph (b) requires that sound and vibration tests or equivalent testsbe conducted in areas where roof supports are to be installed, if the miningheight permits and the visual examination has not disclosed a hazardouscondition. The final rule differs from the proposal in that it permitstests other than sound and vibration tests to be conducted provided thatthese tests are as effective as sound and vibration tests. This changerecognizes that new techniques for testing the roof may be developed. When sound and vibration tests are made, they must be made after the ATRSsystem has been set against the mine roof and before other supports areinstalled. If an ATRS system is not yet in use at the mine, these testsmust be made before each support is manually installed. The mining height exception in the standard recognizes that in high coalseams sound and vibration tests may be impractical. Under the final rule,sound and vibration tests are not required in these circumstances. Several commenters suggested that sound and vibration tests not be requiredat all, stating that these tests involve additional exposure of minersto unsupported roof with no corresponding safety benefit. Sound and vibrationtests are the primary method used in underground coal mines for identifyinghazardous roof conditions, such as unstable or fractured strata just abovethe roof surface, which cannot be detected visually. MSHA believes rooftesting enhances safety of the miners by providing more information forevaluating the condition of the roof. Failure to properly examine or evaluateroof, face, and rib conditions has been the cause or contributing factorin numerous roof fall fatalities that occurred in underground coal mines.Paragraph (c) requires hazardous roof, face, and rib conditions to be correctedbefore there is any other work or travel in the affected area. If the affectedarea is left unattended, the standard requires each entrance to the areato be posted with a readily visible warning. Alternatively, the final rulerequires a physical barrier to be installed to impede travel into the area.These precautions will alert persons entering the area of the dangerouscondition. The final rule revises the existing standard that requires ``loose roofand overhanging or loose faces and ribs'' to be taken down or supported.The final rule specifies that when a ``hazardous roof, face and rib condition''is detected, the condition must be corrected. This change recognizes thatall overhangs may not be hazardous. The proposed requirement that correctiveaction be taken ``immediately'' under these circumstances has been changedin the final rule to require corrective action ``before any other workor travel in the area.'' Corrective action would include taking down orsupporting the material posing the hazard. These changes are intended tosimplify the final rule, while maintaining the purpose of the standard,which is that miners not be exposed to hazardous roof, face, and rib conditions.As proposed, paragraph (d) requires a bar for taking down loose materialto be provided in the working place or on all face equipment except haulageequipment. This bar is required to be of a length and design that wouldpermit the removal of loose material so that the person using the bar isnot exposed to the falling material when it is removed. Appropriate toolsneed to be readily available to perform safe removal of loose material.Commenters suggested that a provision be added to this standard which wouldrequire that loose materials be manually taken down only if the miner worksfrom a location that is permanently supported or is supported by an ATRSsystem. This recommendation was not included in the final rule becauseloose materials can also be safely removed from areas that are supportedby posts or jacks that are manually installed. Therefore, paragraph (d)of this section specifies that the bar used for taking down loose materialbe of a length and design that allows the removal of loose material froma position that does not expose the person performing this work to injuryfrom falling material.Section 75.212 Rehabilitation of areas with unsupported roof. These standards are new and set forth the requirements for rehabilitatingareas with unsupported roof created by mining machines, a fall or blasting.Rehabilitating unsupported areas has proven to be especially hazardousto miners. The roof is often broken, loose and difficult to control. Paragraph (a) requires that, on a site-by-site basis, the mine operatorestablish clean-up and support procedures to be followed during rehabilitationof any areas where a roof fall has occurred or the roof has been removedby mining machines or by blasting. It requires that persons who performthe rehabilitation work at each individual site be instructed in theseprocedures before rehabilitation is started. Normally, such instructionswould be given by a representative of mine management at the rehabilitationsite. Establishing clean-up and support installation procedures on a site-by-sitebasis allows the particular conditions present to be assessed, and a safeapproach to rehabilitating the area to be developed. The final rule further requires that ineffective, damaged or missing roofsupport at the edge of a rehabilitation area be replaced or equivalentsupport provided before rehabilitation work is started. The roof supportsat the edges of a roof fall frequently are damaged, loosened or dislodgedby the fall and must be replaced or equivalent support installed to securethe roof before rehabilitation can be safely started. Some commenters suggested that provisions be included in the final rulethat would require a rehabilitation plan to be developed for approval bythe MSHA District Manager and, after approval, posted at the rehabilitationsite. These commenters expressed the view that it was MSHA's responsibilityto evaluate the plan and that posting it at the work site would providea quick reference in the event of questions or problems. The basic purpose of a rehabilitation program is to assure developmentof safe work procedures for the persons performing rehabilitation workbefore such work is begun. The final rule reflects this purpose by requiringthat the operator establish clean-up and support procedures to be followedduring rehabilitation work and instruct the persons who perform such workin these procedures before rehabilitation work is started. Adding requirementsfor MSHA evaluation and approval of rehabilitation plans before they areimplemented would not always be in the best interest of the safety of miners,and may impose unnecessary delay in rehabilitating unsupported areas. Thefinal rule, therefore, does not adopt this approach. Paragraph (b) requires that persons performing rehabilitation work be experiencedin this work or that they be supervised by a person, designated by themine operator, who has experience in rehabilitation work. Because of thehazardous nature of rehabilitation work, it is essential that inexperiencedpersons not perform such work without proper supervision. Some commenters suggested that the person designated by the operator tosupervise the rehabilitation work be required to be a ``certified person.''The fact that persons are certified does not always mean that they possessskills related to rehabilitation work. In addition, such a requirementwould exclude persons who are experienced and knowledgeable in rehabilitationwork but are not certified. Paragraph (c) addresses the supports to be installed where rehabilitationwork is not being performed. The standard applies to the active workingsof mines, and requires that posts be set on at least 5-foot centers acrosseach entry to the location. Equally effective supports are also permittedto be used. This precaution controls expansion of the unsupported area,and alerts persons to the hazard of unsupported roof. The proposed requirement for a readily visible warning to be posted ora physical barrier installed at the entrance to areas not being rehabilitatedis deleted from the final rule. The requirement for posts on 5-foot centerswill provide a visible indicator of the unsupported area and prevent inadvertententry by alerting persons to the hazards in the area. The term ``mining machines'' has been added to this standard to clarifythat the standard applies to roof removed by mining machines, as well asto roof removed by blasting. In addition, the final rule specifies theAgency's intention that the standard apply to active workings to avoidthe possible interpretation that these supports may be required in abandonedareas. Section 75.213 Roof support removal. This standard, which is derived from existing andSection; 75.204 and existingcriteria in andSection; 75.200-14, establishes requirements for removingpermanent roof supports. It sets forth precautions to minimize the hazardsinvolved in the removal of roof supports and identifies circumstances underwhich roof supports cannot be removed. These requirements replace the existingcriterion which provided that operators who intend to recover roof supportsshould include a detailed plan for such recovery in the roof control plan.Paragraph (a) specifies that the removal of permanent roof supports bedone either by persons experienced in this work or by persons under thesupervision of a person designated by the operator, who is experiencedin removing roof supports. Also, persons performing this work are requiredto have at least one year of underground mining experience so that theyare aware of the general hazards associated with underground mining.The proposal provided for persons removing permanent roof supports to performthis work in the presence of a ``supervisor,'' and assigned the supervisorcertain tasks. Some commenters opposed the use of terms in safety standardswhich suggest job titles or classifications. In response, the final rulerequires that permanent roof support removal be done by experienced persons,or that persons performing this work be supervised by an experienced persondesignated by the operator. The purpose of this requirement is to assurethat at least one person who is knowledgeable and experienced in the removalof permanent roof support is present when this work is performed.Some commenters suggested that the removal of permanent roof supports beprohibited, except where necessary to remove broken crossbars along travelwaysor haulageways. They stated that the dangers miners are exposed to in doingthis type of work outweigh the benefits gained by removing the supports.The primary purpose for removing roof supports is to accommodate blastingof the mine roof to obtain additional height for the installation of anovercast or belt conveyor drive. Crossbars, beams, and other similar supportsare also removed to allow the mine roof to cave, relieving roof pressures.MSHA believes that this work can be performed safely by following the practicesspecified in this standard. The Agency recognizes, however, that the removalof roof bolts is particularly hazardous where full pillar extraction isconducted or adverse roof conditions are present. Indicators such as roofbolt torque readings or the condition of conventional support may showexcessive loading, roof fractures or other signs that the roof is weak.The removal of permanent roof supports under these conditions is addressedby the final rule as discussed below.Paragraph (b) requires a person designated by the operator to examine theroof conditions in the area where the supports are to be removed beforethis work is started. The roof conditions in these areas must be evaluatedto determine whether it is safe to remove the supports.Paragraph (c) requires at least one row of temporary supports on not morethan 5-foot centers or equivalent support, to be installed prior to theremoval of crossbars, beams or similar supports. These supports must beinstalled across the opening from which the supports are to be removed.If one row of temporary supports is not sufficient to assure safe removal,the standard requires additional supports to be installed across the opening.This provision revises the existing criterion which specified that at least2 rows of posts on not more than 4-foot centers be installed across theopening within 4 feet of the location where the supports are to be removed.This revision was made in response to commenters who stated that the supportsrequired by the existing standard was excessive in most applications. Thepurpose of installing these temporary supports is to prevent a roof fallthat may be induced by removal of the crossbars, beams, or similar supports,from extending beyond the area from which the supports are removed. MSHArecognizes that the number of temporary supports necessary to accomplishthis goal can vary depending on the number of crossbars, beams, or similarsupports that are to be removed. For example, when only one crossbar isbeing removed, one row of temporary supports may be sufficient to preventa roof fall from extending beyond the location where the support is beingremoved. On the other hand, when multiple supports are being removed, twoor more rows of breaker posts may be necessary. In addition, other factors,such as the condition of the roof in the area where supports are to beremoved, would influence the number of supports that should be installed.Paragraph (d)(1) addresses the removal of roof bolts. The standard requiresa temporary support to be installed as close as practicable to each roofbolt being removed. After the bolts are removed, if the temporary supportsare also removed, this work must be done from a location under permanentsupports which has not been disturbed. The temporary supports provide protectionfor persons removing the roof bolts. Once the bolts have been removed,the temporary supports are the only means of support. Therefore, the finalrule prohibits the removal of these temporary supports unless they areremoved remotely from a location under permanent supports.Paragraph (d)(2) prohibits the removal of roof bolts in areas where fullpillar extraction is conducted. Full pillar recovery is designed to resultin total caving of the area after the pillars have been removed. Removingroof bolts in these areas would, therefore, be extremely hazardous.Paragraph (e) specifies that each entrance to an area where roof supportshave been removed shall be posted with a readily visible warning or a physicalbarrier installed to impede travel into the area. Some commenters suggestedthat this standard require both a visible warning and a physical barrierto prevent miners from unintentionally entering these areas. They alsostated that the cost of installing both methods would be justified by theprotection they would provide to miners. The purpose of this standard isto provide a warning for persons approaching an area where the roof ishazardous. The Agency believes that this can be accomplished either bya visible warning or a physical barrier, and that requiring both methodsis unnecessary.Paragraph (f) outlines the conditions under which removal of permanentroof supports is prohibited. Under the final rule, supports cannot be removedwhere roof bolt torque or tension measurements or the condition of conventionalroof supports indicate excessive loading, where roof fractures are present,or where there is any other indication that the roof is structurally weak.In these areas, any disturbance of the roof supports may trigger a rooffall with resultant injuries or fatalities. An exception has been addedto this standard to allow the removal of supports if the persons involvedin such removal are in a remote location under supported roof. For example,roof supports could be removed through the use of cables pulled from asafe distance so that no miners are exposed to roof fall hazards.Paragraph (g) is new and specifies that the provisions of this sectiondo not apply when removing conventional support for starting crosscutsand pillar splits or lifts. This provision reflects Agency practice ofnot considering removal of supports in these situations in the same contextas other types of roof support removal. However, the standard requiresthat the roof conditions be determined before the supports are removed.Section 75.214 Supplemental support materials, equipment and tools.This section is derived from existing andSection;andSection; 75.202 and 75.202-1and requires supplies of supplementary support materials, equipment andtools in the event adverse roof conditions are encountered or a roof falloccurs. These materials must be available in a quantity sufficient to supportthe roof if adverse roof conditions are encountered or a roof fall accidentoccurs. The purpose of the standard is to assure that supplemental supportmaterials and the necessary tools for their installation are availableon or near each working section. These supplies will expedite recoveryoperations in the event of an accident, and provide for the installationof supplemental supports when adverse roof conditions are encountered.These provisions were not included in the proposal although provisionsfor supplementary support materials did appear in the preproposal draft.Several commenters objected to this proposed deletion suggesting that supplementarysupport materials are necessary in emergency situations. Upon reconsideration,the Agency has concluded that provisions for supplies of supplementarysupport materials, equipment and tools should be retained in the finalrule.However, the final rule deletes existing standards in andSection;andSection;75.202 and 75.202-1 which address the regular supply of support materialsfor areas exposed during the mining cycle. This change is responsive tothe concerns of several commenters who suggested that operators be allowedthe flexibility to decide how support materials are supplied to each section.It also recognizes that the installation of supports in areas where personswork or travel is the important element that should be addressed by thefinal rule, not how the supports are supplied to the working section.Section 75.215 Longwall mining systems.This new provision provides that for each longwall mining section the roofcontrol plan must specify the support methods that will be used to maintaina safe travelway out of the section through the tailgate side of the longwall.In addition, the plan must set forth the procedures that the operator willfollow should a fall occur that prevents travel out of the section throughthe tailgate side of the longwall, despite the support measures taken.These provisions are derived from a study undertaken by MSHA and Agencyexperience. On January 28, 1985, MSHA established a task force to studytwo-entry mining systems in underground coal mines. On June 12, 1985, MSHAissued its report, Two-Entry Longwall Mining_A Technical Evaluation, whichcontained 35 recommendations directed at safe operation of these miningsystems. Following the report, on July 18, 1985, MSHA held a meeting inDenver, Colorado, to brief the public on the Agency's task force report.At that meeting and in subsequent response to the report, members of themining public suggested that the MSHA include the recommendations in theappropriate coal mine safety standards under review to afford opportunityfor comment through the rulemaking process. Consistent with these suggestions,the Agency included the four recommendations that were applicable to roofcontrol in the preamble discussion of the proposed rule.For mines using longwall mining systems, the report specifically recommendedthat: (1) Systematic supplemental support be installed throughout the tailgateentry prior to mining a panel; (2) systematic supplemental support fortailgate entries of subsequent longwall panels be installed in advanceof frontal abutment stresses of the adjacent panel being mined; (3) anexamination of these entries be made at least once every seven days; and(4) procedures be formulated by the operator that address the actions tobe taken should the tailgate travelway on a longwall panel be closed dueto a ground failure. The term ``longwall panel'' refers to the block ofcoal isolated by the development entries, which is to be removed by thelongwall mining unit.MSHA specifically solicited comment and data on the merits of these provisions,the applicability of the provisions to all longwall mining systems, andwhether the provisions would be more appropriate as criteria for approvalof mine roof control plans for longwall mining or as standards applicableto all mines using longwalls.The Agency received a wide range of comments. Some commenters suggestedthat the provisions be included in the final rule as standards applicableto all longwall mining systems. They stated that the recommendations werein the nature of existing standards and to include them as plan-approvalcriteria provisions would diminish protections currently afforded miners.Other commenters suggested that the recommendations be included in thefinal rule as criteria and be applicable only to longwall panels developedwith two entries. They stated that mining conditions at various depths,different coalbeds, and differences in equipment demand the site-specificapproach afforded by mine roof control plans.The travelways on all longwall panels are through the headgate entries,the tailgate entries, and the bleeder entries inby the face. Travelwaysare more easily maintained on the headgate side of longwall panels sincethese entries are adjacent to solid coal, while the tailgate entries areadjacent to mined-out areas. Therefore, additional supports in tailgateentires are frequently necessary to maintain a safe travelway from thisside of the longwall panel. In the event of life-threatening conditions,such as a fire in the intake aircourse or an outburst of the longwall facewhich impedes passage, egress from the longwall panel for persons workinginby the affected areas may be limited to one side of the longwall. Keepingboth the headgate and tailgate entries open also assures that adequateventilation can be maintained for the longwall mining unit.In longwall panels developed with two entries, a roof fall in the tailgateentry often poses an immediate obstruction to travel along that side ofthe longwall panel and can impair ventilation of the longwall face, unlessa travelway is available adjacent to the gob through the bleeder entries.In longwall panels developed with more than two entries, a roof fall onthe tailgate side may not initially impede passage, as a route bypassingthe obstruction through the adjoining tailgate entries or bleeder entriesmay be available. Similarly, ventilation may not initially be adverselyaffected since an aircourse through other tailgate entries may still beintact. However, when mining progresses to a point where the longwall faceabuts the failed area, exit from the panel on the tailgate side can beblocked and ventilation of the longwall face may be impaired.Recognizing that falls along tailgate entries of longwalls can presentsimilar hazards, the final rule applies to all mines. The final rule alsoacknowledges the concern of commenters that variation among mining conditionsand other such factors warrant an individualized approach. This is accomplishedby requiring that support methods for tailgate entries and safety proceduresin the event of a blocked tailgate travelway be set forth in the roof controlplan of each mine.Consistent with this approach, andSection; 75.222(g) of the final rule providescriteria for evaluating support in longwall tailgate entries, and the factorsthat should be addressed when a fall prevents travel on the tailgate sideof a longwall. These provisions, based on the recommendations of MSHA'stask force report, provide guidance as to when additional support shouldbe installed and describe the safety issues that should be addressed iftravel through the tailgate side of a longwall panel is blocked. Amongthe issues to be addressed are communication systems, monitoring of theventilation system and reinstruction of miners on the availability anduse of self-contained self-rescue devices (SCRS).The term ``travelway'' as used in this final rule, is not to be construedto mean ``escapeway.'' Existing MSHA standards, 30 CFR 75.1704, 75.1704-1,75.1704-2, and 75.1707, establish requirements for escapeways. These standardsare also being reviewed as part of a separate rulemaking to revise andupdate the Agency's standards for ventilation of underground coal mines.The task force recommendation that examinations be made of tailgate entriesat least every seven days is not included in the final rule. Examinationof these entries is already required by existing standards at 30 CFR 75.305,which require at least one entry for each intake and return aircourse tobe examined each week for hazardous conditions. Tailgate entries are eitherintake or return aircourses.Section 75.220 Roof control plan. This standard revises and consolidates existing andSection;andSection;75.200through 75.200-4, which address roof control plans and programs. It narrowsthe scope of roof control plans, while retaining the basic requirementthat each mine be operated in accordance with a roof control plan approvedby the District Manager. The roof control plan concept, which has been used effectively throughoutthe coal mining industry, grew out of a need for flexibility to addressthe unique conditions of each mine. Under the plan approach, roof conditionsand experience with such conditions in the mine are addressed on a mine-by-minebasis. For this reason, the majority of commenters endorsed continuingthe use of approved plans. Currently, roof control plans address nearly all aspects of roof controlpractice at mines. As a result, many roof control plans have become unnecessarilyvoluminous and complex. To make roof control plans more relevant and lessburdensome, existing criteria generally applicable to all mines are includedin the final rule as mandatory standards. Roof control plans will thereforecontain only the particular roof control measures necessary to addressthe unique conditions of the mine, making them less complex and more usefulto the persons responsible for implementing these plans. The requirement of a roof control plan for each mine in addition to compliancewith the standards set forth in the final rule recognizes that standardsof general applicability cannot be developed to address all necessary aspectsof roof support for all mines. While standards applicable to all minescan be formulated, they fall short of addressing the particular hazardsand problems of roof, face and rib control presented by complex combinationsof variables such as coal seam composition, surrounding geological conditionsand the mining system employed. Thus, in addition to establishing standardsthat have general application, the final rule also requires a roof controlplan for each mine. In this plan, the roof control safety measures notspecified by the standards are defined on a mine-by-mine basis. Under the final rule, each operator is required to develop and follow aroof control plan approved by the District Manager. The operator's planmust be suitable to the prevailing geological conditions and the systemof mining to be used at the mine. The operator is also required to takeadditional measures if unusual hazards are encountered. The final rule retains the existing procedure that the operator submitthe proposed roof control plan, or revisions to an existing approved plan,to the District Manager for approval. Added to this is a new provisionwhich specifies that when revisions to an approved roof control plan areproposed by the operator, only the revised pages need to be submitted unlessotherwise specified by the District Manager. Therefore, the entire planneed not be submitted when, for example, the operator proposes a smalladdition or the replacement of a few pages. However, the District Managerhas the discretion to require that the entire plan be resubmitted whenthe submission of revised pages would prevent effective evaluation of theplan. Consistent with current practice, the operator's roof control plan andany revisions to it will be evaluated independently for approval. The focusof the District Manager's evaluation will be on whether the plan's provisions,if implemented, will result in adequate support and control of the roof,face and ribs under the particular conditions at the mine. In the courseof this evaluation, the applicable criteria in andSection;75.222 of the finalrule will be considered. As described below, plans not conforming withthese criteria may be approved, provided that safe and effective roof,face and rib control can be achieved.Paragraph (b) sets out the procedure for notification of approval or denialof approval of roof control plans, retaining the existing requirement thatthe operator be given written notice of approval actions. With clarifyingchanges, the rule also retains the existing procedure for exchanging informationwhen approval of a proposed plan or revision is denied. Under the finalrule, the operator will be advised of the deficiencies of the proposedplan or revision for which approval is denied, together with changes recommendedfor approval. The operator will then be given an opportunity to discusswith the District Manager the problems identified and potential solutions.The revised language of the rule is intended to clarify the operator'sresponsibility for developing an appropriate roof control plan and MSHA'srole in evaluating the plan for approval. The final rule authorizes the District Manager to require that the effectivenessof new support materials, devices or systems, other than roof bolts andaccessories, be demonstrated by experimental installations. The phrase``other than roof bolts or accessories'' has been added to the final rulebecause testing and evaluation of new types of roof bolts and accessoriesare addressed in andSection;75.204 of the final rule. Consistent with the existing rule, the final rule provides the operatorwith the opportunity to discuss the deficiencies and changes in a proposedroof control plan with the District Manager. Paragraph (c) retains the proposed requirement that roof control plansor revisions not be implemented until approved. Paragraph (d) specifies that before implementing a revision to an approvedroof control plan, all persons who are affected by the revision must beinstructed in its provisions. Complete understanding of the requirementsof the approved roof control plan for the mine is essential to effectiveimplementation. For clarity, the terms ``supervisors and miners,'' whichappeared in the proposal, have been replaced in the final rule by the phrase``all persons.'' Paragraph (e) requires that the roof control plan and any revisions bemade available to the miners and representatives of miners at the mine.Making the plan and revisions available to the miners and their representativeswill assure that all workers and their representatives at the mine areinformed of provisions in the roof control plan. In response to commenters, the proposed provision specifying that roofcontrol plans and revisions be posted is not included in the final rule.These commenters stated that posting the plan is an impractical way toprovide miners access to it and that the plan is made available to theminers in other ways, including through training. MSHA agrees that thepurpose of this provision is to make plans available to miners. Therefore,the final rule requires roof control plans to be made available to minersand their representatives and does not contain a posting requirement. Paragraph (f) revises the proposed requirement that all roof control plansbe revised to meet the requirements of this new Subpart C within 6 monthsfrom the effective date of the final rule. This provision will only affectroof control plans which contain provisions in conflict with the finalrule. Revising conflicting provisions in plans will assure that minersare aware of the requirements in effect and will eliminate any ambiguitiesthat may arise. Some commenters suggested that a provision be added to the final rule thatwould require mine management, at the start of each shift, to review withthe miners in each working section the roof control measures that are neededto effectively control the roof. These commenters stated that because theroof conditions can change from shift to shift, the supervisors and minersworking on each oncomming shift should be made aware of the changes andany materials needed to control the roof. MSHA recognizes that this isa good safety practice that is often followed in the mining industry. However,since the final rule establishes operator responsibility for controllingthe mine roof, face and ribs, together with safety standards for certainsupport and control techniques, the Agency does not believe that such aprovision needs to be included in the final rule. Several commenters recommended that a separate set of regulations be developedas part of this rulemaking which would establish comprehensive new proceduresfor approving all mine plans. These commenters recommended procedures whichwould establish an appeal process to resolve issues regarding plan provisionsupon which the operator and the District Manager cannot agree. Based onMSHA experience with the current plan-approval process, the vast majorityof issues raised during plan-approval are resolved through staff discussionbetween the mine operator and District Manager. Issues that cannot be resolvedin this manner are normally raised to the District Manager level. However,if a mine operator disagrees with a decision of the District Manager, theexisting plan-approval process inherently allows the mine operator to appealthe decision to the Administrator for Coal mine Safety and Health for finalresolution. The Agency will address the formalization of this appeal procedurein the forthcoming proposed rule for Ventilation of Underground Coal Mines.When the ventilation rule is finalized, the Agency will propose revisionsto this final rule to formalize appeal procedures for roof control plans.A commenter suggested that the final rule should provide miners, throughtheir representatives, to have the right to participate in the approvalprocess for roof control plans. This recommendation and the issues whichit raises will be addressed by the Agency in the proposed rule for Ventilation.When the Ventilation proposal is finalized, the Agency will propose appropriateamendments to the roof control regulations to reflect the approach developedduring the ventilation rule-making with respect to miners participation.Section 75.221 Roof control plan information. This final rule is derived from existing andSection;andSection; 75.200-5, 75.201-1,and criteria in andSection;andSection; 75-200-7, 75.200-12 and 75.200-15, exceptparagraphs (a)(6), (7), and (10) which are new. It specifies the informationthat is required in roof control plans. The information required by this standard forms a basis for MSHA evaluationon operators' plans. The information required to be submitted with eachplan includes identifying information, data related to the strata in whichmining is to be conducted, and descriptions of the mining methods and supportmaterials to be used. New requirements of the rule address the use of ATRSsystems, tunnel liners, and methods of protecting persons from fallingmaterials at drift openings and when mining within 150 feet of an outcrop.Flexibility is needed in these areas to address the particular conditionsat each mine. In response to commenters, the proposed requirement for the ``signature''of the company official responsible for the roof control plan has beenchanged to require this person's ``name.'' Commenters suggested this changewould clarify the purpose of the rule which is to identify a company officialthat MSHA may contact to resolve any issues that arise during evaluationof the plan. In response to commenters, the final rule retains the existing requirementthat roof control plans show the thickness of each stratum up to and includingthe main roof over the coalbed and for a distance of 10 feet under thecoalbed. These commenters stated, and MSHA agrees, that this informationis necessary to determine the widths of entries, size of pillars, and othermeasures necessary to provide effective roof control.Commenters suggested that the final rule require that the ``planned'' widthof openings be specified in roof control plans, noting that the width ofopenings cannot be predicted with precision. MSHA agrees and the finalrule includes this suggestion. MSHA recognizes that the width of openingscan at times be inadvertently exceeded for various reasons. This issueis also addressed in andSection; 75.203(e) which requires additional roofsupport when planned widths are exceeded by specified distances.To clarify the final rule and in response to comments, paragraph (a)(9)provides that the list of support materials specified in proposed roofcontrol plans include all the support materials that are ``required'' beused in the support system described by the roof control plan. Supportmaterials that may be installed in addition to the supports specified bythe roof control plan are not required to be listed.The final rule requires that the roof control plan identify the methodof protecting miners from falling material at drift openings and when miningapproaches within 150 feet of an outcrop. The support needed at drift openingscan vary substantially from mine to mine. Mining near an outcrop can presentunique roof control hazards due to roof fractures caused by surface blastingand other conditions created by water seepage and geological irregularities.Some commenters suggested that roof control plans identify coalbeds aboveand below the mine that are being or have been mined. These commentersstated that this information was necessary to properly evaluate roof controlplans. MSHA agrees that this is useful information. However, this informationis already available to the Agency under 30 CFR 75.316-1(a)(1) and neednot be duplicated by the requirements of these standards.As discussed in andSection; 75.204(f)(2) of the final rule, a provision hasbeen added to this section that requires mine operators to specify theintervals at which test holes will be drilled when mechanically anchoredtensioned bolts are used. Consistent with the removal of standards addressingarched roof, a provision which appeared in this section of the proposalthat would have required the method and frequency of evaluating the coalroof thickness for natural roof support created by means of an arched roof,has been deleted from the final rule.One commenter suggested that a provision be added to the final rule whichwould require roof control plans to show faults and other disturbancesthat are indicated by a satellite strata survey. MSHA's Technical SupportGroup has conducted numerous satellite surveys in the last ten years. Thesesurveys have provided useful information for some mines but have shownno benefit at others. While satellite surveys have potential merit, thecollection and distribution of this type of satellite data is not, to MSHA'sknowledge, sufficiently established to make its use a requirement underthe final rule.Section 75.222 Roof control plan-approval criteria.The final rule is derived from existing criteria in andSection;andSection;75.200-6 through 75.200-9, 75.200-11 and 75.200-12, except paragraph (e)which is new. These provisions are criteria, as opposed to standards, thatare to be considered by the operator in formulating roof control plansand by MSHA in evaluating plans and revisions submitted by operators forapproval. The purpose of the criteria is to provide guidance for the developmentand approval of roof control plans, while retaining the flexibility neededto address the variations among mining conditions. For example, when roofbolts are used, a criterion provides that they should be installed on centersnot exceeding 5 feet lengthwise and crosswise. While this spacing is commonlyused, the conditions at some mines require that roof bolts be installedcloser together, while under more stable conditions, they may be safelyinstalled farther apart. The final rule also authorizes MSHA to requiresafety measures in addition to those described by the plan-approval criteriaand standards in the final rule. Correspondingly, roof control plans notconforming to the criteria in this section may be approved, provided thatthe methods proposed by the operator will result in effective control ofthe mine roof, face and ribs. Paragraph (a) specifies that the provisions in this section are criteriathat are to be considered when formulating and approving roof control plans.In response to commenters recommending evaluation of the applicabilityof criteria at each mine, the final rule specifies that the criteria be``considered on a mine-by-mine basis.'' Consistent with this concern, thesecommenters also suggested that the proposed phrase ``generally acceptedcriteria'' be removed as this could be misconstrued to mean that the criteriaprovisions were applicable to all mines. To avoid confusion, the finalrule does not retain this characterization of the criteria for roof controlplans.The provisions in this section are intended to provide the flexibilityneeded to address the variations among mining conditions at individualmines. The plan-approval criteria reflect MSHA experience and industrypractices, and provide a reference point for evaluating roof control measuresfor effectiveness.In addition to the flexibility provided for by the plan-approval criteria,the final rule retains two existing provisions that are intended to facilitatethe development and approval of mine-specific roof control plans whichare suitable to each mine's conditions and mining system. Under the finalrule, District Managers are authorized to require, before approving a planor revision, that safety measures be included which are in addition tothose provided for by the plan-approval criteria or the final rule standards.Because the Agency's purpose was to write comprehensive new standards andcriteria, this provision was not included in the proposed rule. On reconsideration,however, MSHA has concluded that current experience and practices are inadequateto predict and address unique hazards at individual mines which, if themine roof control plans are to be adequate, will need to be addressed.Consistent with the objective of maintaining the flexibility to developsuitable roof control plans, the final rule also authorizes District Managersto approve roof control plans which do not conform with plan-approval criteriathat would normally apply. This provision, which was included in the proposal,recognizes that future development may offer effective roof, face, andrib control as applied at a particular mine, and should be permitted tobe implemented in accordance with the mine's roof control plan.Paragraph (b) addresses roof bolting and provides criteria for the spacingand torquing of roof bolts. Proper spacing and torquing of roof bolts aredirectly related to support capacity.Provisions addressing ``combination roof support'' which appeared separatelyin the proposal, have been combined with the roof bolting criteria provisonssince all combination systems include some roof bolting.Several commenters suggested that the proposed criterion for 5-foot spacingof roof bolts be changed to 4-foot spacing. They stated that 4-foot spacingof bolts is normally used throughout the industry. MSHA agrees that somemines are currently installing roof bolts on 4-foot spacings. However,due to the composition of the strata and roof conditions encountered atdifferent mines, the spacing of roof bolts and other supports will varyfrom mine to mine and, in some situations, from section to section withinthe same mine. The existing criterion for spacing of roof bolts is 5 feet.This criterion has proven to be effective in providing guidance to operatorsand MSHA for determining the spacing of roof bolts as well as other supports.Supports on 4-foot spacing will continue to be required where needed foreffective roof control.For purposes of consistency with andSection; 75.204(f)(3) of the final ruleand in response to commenters, paragraph (b)(2) has been revised to includea reference to anchorage capacity of the strata. This change specifiesthat the torque or tension range of tension roof bolts be at least 50 percentof the anchorage capacity of the strata.The existing criterion which specifies that openings supported only withroof bolts should not be more than 20 feet wide has been deleted. Thisprovision is duplicative of paragraph (b)(3) of this section which specifiesthat openings more than 20 feet wide should be supported by a combinationof roof bolts and conventional supports.Paragraph (b) also contains provisions that address the use of roof supportsystems using a combination of bolts and conventional support materials.Paragraph (b)(3) provides that such system should be used where mine openingsare to be more than 20 feet wide. These criteria provide that posts shouldbe used to narrow the roadway to 16 feet wide where straight and 18 feetwide where curved; that a row of posts should be set for each 5 feet ofspace between the roadway post and the rib; and that mine openings shouldnot exceed 30 feet.The proposed criterion for width of openings where natural roof supportis created by means of an arched roof has been deleted from the final rulebecause ``arched roof'' is no longer addressed in the final rule.The criteria provisions which addressed the use of conventional supportsas the sole means of roof support that were included in this section ofthe proposal have been included in andSection; 75.206(a) of the final ruleas mandatory standards.Paragraph (c) addresses the installation of roof supports using miningmachines with integral roof bolters. The provisions in this paragraph,which address the spacing of supports and width of roadways, are unchangedfrom the proposal.Paragraph (d) addresses pillar recovery and sets forth the criteria forpillar size, mining of pillars, width of openings and roadways leadingto pillars and the spacing of breaker and roadside-radius posts duringpillar recovery. Consistent with the existing criteria, the final rulespecifies that breaker posts and roadside-radius posts should be installedon 4-foot centers. One commenter suggested that this spacing be increasedto 5-foot centers so that they would be consistent with the spacing ofmost other supports. MSHA recognizes that 5-foot spacing of breaker postsmay be appropriate in some mines depending on a variety of factors; suchas depth of the coalbed and the type of roof strata. However, experienceobtained through the use of the existing criterion indicates that breakerposts should be installed on at least 4-foot centers at the majority ofmines.The final rule retains the existing criterion which states that, beforefull pillar recovery is started, posts should be installed to limit roadwaywidths to 16 feet in areas where roof bolts are used as the only meansof roof supports. Commenters suggested that this provision be deleted,stating that these posts restrict the movement of mining equipment withoutproviding a corresponding safety benefit. They further stated that theroof in these areas is adequately supported during development and, unlesshazardous roof conditions are encountered, should be adequate for retreatmining. MSHA recognizes that because of the various geological conditionsencountered at underground coal mines, this criterion may not be appropriatefor all mines. However, at some mines, it is necessary to reduce the roadwaywidth before pillar recovery is started to assure safe removal of the coalpillars. Inclusion of this provision as a criterion, as opposed to a mandatorystandard, will provide the flexibility to address the need for reducingroadway width on a mine-by-mine basis.A provision which appeared in this section of the proposal addressing theuse of temporary supports in conjunction with ATRS systems has been movedto andSection; 75.209(b) of the final rule.Paragraph (e) addresses the support of openings that create an intersection.It states that such openings should be permanently supported or that atleast one row of temporary supports be installed on 5-foot centers priorto any other work or travel in the intersection. This provision appearedas a standard in the proposed rule. However, commenters suggested thatthe proposed provision was too restrictive and not appropriate for allmines. MSHA agrees that greater flexibility should be afforded with regardto supports installed in openings to intersections. Roof conditions varyfrom mine to mine and influence the spacing and number of posts, numberof rows of posts or the use of roof bolts. Therefore, this provision hasbeen incorporated into the criteria section of the final rule.Section 75.223 Evaluation and revision of roof control plans.Section 75.223 requires that revisions to roof control plans be proposedby operators when conditions indicate that the plan is not suitable forcontrolling the roof, face or ribs, or coal or rock bursts. Under thisstandard, any condition which indicates the plan is not suitable for controllingthe roof, face, ribs, or coal or rock bursts requires that the plan berevised. The phrase ``coal or rock bursts'' has been added to this standardto clarify that it is also necessary to revise a plan that is not suitablefor controlling coal or rock bursts. This addition is consistent with andSection;75.202and clarifies that the control of coal or rock bursts is included withinthe scope of control of roof, face and ribs.This standard also requires the plan to be revised when accidents and injuriesat the mine indicate the plan is inadequate. The accident and injury experienceis required to be reviewed at least every 6 months. This six-month reviewof accident and injury experience was contained in the preproposal draftbut not included in the proposal. Upon reconsideration, MSHA believes thata regular review of the accident and injury experience at the mine willsupply important data with which to evaluate the adequacy of roof controlplans.The proposal that unplanned roof or rib falls in active workings be plottedon a mine map and that the map be made available to MSHA and miners' representativeshas been retained in the final rule. Plotting unplanned falls on a minemap will assist in evaluating the effectiveness of the roof control systemand identification of hazardous trends.In the preproposal draft and the proposal the Agency asked for commentswith respect to the deletion of the requirement for 6-month review of roofcontrol plans by MSHA. Several commenters suggested that this requirementshould remain in effect, indicating that plans must be periodically evaluatedby MSHA to assure that they are revised as conditions warrant.Agency personnel currently review the adequacy of roof control plans duringregular inspections which are conducted at least quarterly in undergroundcoal mines. In addition, MSHA reviews the adequacy of the roof supportsystem during investigations of unplanned roof falls. These current practiceshave been successful in assuring that roof control plans are reviewed atleast every 6 months. To clarify that these current practices will continue,the final rule retains the existing standard requiring that roof controlplans be reviewed by MSHA at least every 6 months.<ITAG tagnum="84">Petitions for Modification</ITAG>Operators with petitions for modification that involve the standards revisedin this rulemaking need to determine the status of those petitions beforethe effective date of this final rule. If there are sections of this rulewhich are renumbered but remain substantively unchanged from the existingstandards, operators with modifications granted for these standards neednot reapply. However, operators with modifications granted for standardsthat have been revised will need to comply with the new rule on its effectivedate. New petitions for modification of the final rule may be submittedin accordance with 30 CFR Part 44. If Agency assistance is needed, questionsshould be directed to the appropriate MSHA District Office.<ITAG tagnum="84">Derivation Table </ITAG>The following derivation table lists the number of each standard in thefinal rule (New No.), and the number of the existing standard (Old No.)from which the new standard is derived. An asterisk (*) indicates existingcriteria in Subpart C. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,r25</C> <H1>New No. </H1><H1>Old No.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200 <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201(a) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201(b) <D>75.200-11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.202 <D>75.200 and 75.200-14(g)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203(a) <D>75.201, 75.201-1 and 75.201-2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203 (b) and (d) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203(c) <D>75.200-7(c)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203(e) <D>75.201-1(b) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(a) <D>75.200-7(a)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(b) <D>75.200-12(c)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(c) <D>75.200-7(a) (4) and (5)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(d) <D>75.200-7(a)(6)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(e) <D>75.200-7(b)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(1) <D>75.200-7(a) (2) and (3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(2) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(3) <D>75.200-7(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(4)<D>75.200-7(b)(3)(ii)* and 75.203 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f) (5) and (6) <D>75.200-7(b)(3)(iii)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(7) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(f)(8) <D>75.200-7(b)(4)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204(g) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.205(a), (b), and (c) <D>75.200-12(b)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(a)(1) <D>75.200-8(d)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(a)(2) <D>75.200-8(c)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(a)(3) <D>75.200-8(c)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(a) (4) and (5) <D>75.200-8(c)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(a)(5) <D>75.200-8(c)(4)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(b)(1) <D>75.200-8(a)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(b)(2) (i) <D>75.200-8(a)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(b)(2) (ii) and (iii) <D>75.200-8(a)(4)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(b)(3) <D>75.200-8(a)(5)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(c) and (d) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(e) <D>75.200-8(b)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(f) <D>75.200-8(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(g) <D>75.200-8(b)(4)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.206(h) <D>75.200-8(b)(5)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.207(a) <D>75.201-2 (d) and (e) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.207(b)(1) <D>75.200-11(d)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.207(b)(2) <D>75.200-11(e)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.207(c) <D>75.200-11(f)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.207(d) <D>75.200-11(h)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.208 <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.209 <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.210(a) <D>75.200, 75.200-13(a) (1)* and (2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.210(b) <D>75.200-13(a)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.210(c) <D>75.200-13(b)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.210(d) <D>75.200-13(a)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.211 (a) and (b) <D>75.205 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.211(c) <D>75.202 and 75.205 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.211(d) <D>75.200-13(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.212 (a) and (b) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.212(c) <D>75.200-13(b)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(a)(1) <D>75.200-14(a)* and 75.204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(a)(2) <D>75.200-14(b)* and 75.204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(b) <D>75.200-14 (c)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(c) <D>75.200-14 (e)* and (f)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(d)(1) <D>75.200-14 (e)* and (f)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(d)(2) <D>75.200-14(d)(2)* and 75.204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(e) <D>75.200-14(h)* and 75.204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(f) <D>75.200-14(d) (1)*, (3)* and 75.204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.213(g) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.214 <D>75.202-1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.215 <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(a)(1) <D>75.200, 75.200-2 and 75.200-3 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(a)(2) <D>75.200 and 75.200-4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(b) <D>75.200-4 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(c) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(d) <D>75.200-1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(e) <D>75.200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.220(f) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(1) <D>75.200-5(a)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(2) <D>75.200-5(b)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(3) <D>75.200-5(c)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(4) <D>75.200-5(e)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(5) <D>75.200-5(f)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a) (6) and (7) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(8) <D>75.201-1 and 75.201-2 (a) and (f) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a)(9) <D>75.200-5(f)(2)* and 75.200-7(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221(a) (10) and (11) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.221 (b) and (c) <D>75.200-5(f)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(a) <D>75.200-6* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(1) <D>75.200-7(c)(1)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(2) <D>75.200-7(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(3) <D>75.200-9(a)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(4)(i) <D>75.200-9(b)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(4)(ii) <D>75.200-9(c)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(b)(5) <D>75.200-9(d)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(c)(1) <D>75.200-12(b)(2)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(c)(2) <D>75.200-12(b)(3)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(d)(1) <D>75.200-11(b)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(d)(2) <D>75.200-11(c)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(d)(3) <D>75.200-11(d)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(d)(4) <D>75.200-11(e)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222(d)(5) <D>75.200-11(g)* </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.222 (e), (f), and (g) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.223(a) <D>75.200, 75.200-1 and 75.200-2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.223(b) <D>75.200-1 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.223(c) <D>New </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.223(d) <D>75.200</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Redesignation Table</ITAG>The following redesignation table cross-references the old standard numberswith the standard numbers used in the final rule. An asterisk (*) indicatesexisting criteria in Subpart C.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,r25</C> <H1>Old No. </H1><H1>New No.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200<D>75.202, 75.210(a), 75.220(a) (1) and (2), 75.220(d) and 75.223</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-1<D>75.220(c), 75.223 (a) and (b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-2<D>75.220(a)(1) and 75.223(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-3<D>75.220(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-4<D>75.220 (a)(2) and (b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(a)<D>75.221(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(b)<D>75.221(a)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(c)<D>75.221(a)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(d)<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(e)<D>75.221(a)(4)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(f)<D>75.221(a)(5)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(f)(1)<D>75.221(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-5(f)(2)<D>75.221(a)(9)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-6<D>75.222(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(a)(1)*<D>75.204(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(a) (2)* and (3)*<D>75.204(f)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(a) (4)* and (5)*<D>75.204(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(a)(6)*<D>75.204(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(1)*<D>75.204(e)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(2)*<D>75.204(f)(3), 75.221(a)(9), and 75.222(b)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(3)(i)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(3)(ii)*<D>75.204(f)(4)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(3)(iii)*<D>75.204(f) (5) and (6)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(b)(4)*<D>75.204(f)(8)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(c)(1)*<D>75.222(b)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(c)(2)*<D>75.203(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(c)(3)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-7(d)*<D>75.222(b)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(a)(1)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(a)(2)*<D>75.206(b)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(a)(3)*<D>75.206(b)(2)(i)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(a)(4)*<D>75.206(b)(2) (ii) and (iii)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(a)(5)*<D>75.206(b)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(b)(1)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(b)(2)*<D>75.206(f)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(b)(3)*<D>75.206(e)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(b)(4)*<D>75.206(g)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(b)(5)*<D>75.206(h)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(c)(1)*<D>75.206(a)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(c)(2)*<D>75.206(a) (4) and (5)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(c)(3)*<D>75.206(a)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(c)(4)*<D>75.206(a)(6)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-8(d)*<D>75.206(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-9(a)*<D>75.222(b)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-9(b)*<D>75.222(b)(4)(i)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-9(c)*<D>75.222(b)(4)(ii)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-9(d)*<D>75.222(b)(5)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-10*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11*<D>75.201(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(a)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(b)*<D>75.222(d)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(c)*<D>75.222(d)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(d)*<D>75.207(b)(1) and 75.222(d)(3)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(e)*<D>75.207(b)(2) and 75.222(d)(4)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(f)*<D>75.207(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(g)*<D>75.222(d)(5)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(h)(1)*<D>75.207(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-11(h)(2)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(a) (1)*, (2)*, (3)*, and (4)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(b)(1)*<D>75.205 (a), (b), and (c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(b)(2)*<D>75.222(c)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(b)(3)*<D>75.222(c)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(b)(4)*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-12(c)*<D>75.204(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-13(a) (1)* and (2)*<D>75.210(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-13(a)(3)*<D>75.210 (b) and (d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-13(b)(1)*<D>75.210(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-13(b)(2)*<D>75.211(d)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-13(b)(3)*<D>75.212(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14*<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(a)*<D>75.213(a)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(b)*<D>75.213(a)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(c)*<D>75.213(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(d)(1)*<D>75.213(f)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(d)(2)*<D>75.213(d)(2)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(d)(3)*<D>75.213(f)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(e)*<D>75.213 (c) and (d)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(f)*<D>75.213 (c)(2) and (d)(1)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(g)*<D>75.202(b)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.200-14(h)*<D>75.213(e)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201<D>75.203(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-1(a)<D>75.221(a)(8) and 75.203(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-1(b)<D>75.203(e)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2<D>75.203(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2(a)<D>75.203(a) and 75.221(a)(8)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2 (b) and (c)<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2 (d) and (e)<D>75.207(a)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2(f)<D>75.203(a) and 75.221(a)(8)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-2 (g) and (h)<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.201-3<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.202<D>75.211(c)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.202-1<D>75.214</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203<D>75.204(f)(4)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.203-1<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204<D>75.213 (a), (d)(2), (e), and (f)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.204-1<D>Removed</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">75.205<D>75.211 (a), (b), and (c)</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">III. Drafting Information </ITAG>The principal persons responsible for preparing this final rule are: CloydBlankenship, Charles S. Battistoni, and Fred H. Ryan, Coal Mine Safetyand Health, MSHA; M. Terry Hoch, Technical Support, MSHA; Earnest C. Teaster,Jr., Office of Standards, Regulations and Variances, MSHA; and M. PeterGarcia, Office of the Solicitor, Department of Labor. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Executive Order 12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG>In accordance with Executive Order 12291, MSHA has prepared a final analysisto identify potential costs and benefits associated with the final changesto its roof, face and rib control standards for underground coal mines.The Agency has incorporated this analysis into the Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis required by the Regulatory Flexibility Act. In this analysis,summarized below, MSHA has determined that new or revised provisions inthe final rule will not result in major cost increases nor have an effectof $100 million or more on the economy. The rule is not within the criteriafor a major rule and, therefore, a Regulatory Impact Analysis is not required.The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires that agencies evaluate and include,wherever possible, compliance alternatives that minimize any adverse impacton small businesses when developing standards. For purposes of the RegulatoryFlexibility Act, MSHA has defined small business entities as mines withfewer than 20 employees. This final rule introduces alternative compliancemethods to the existing regulations, several of which will directly benefitsmall mining operations. In the final rule, MSHA has reorganized, updated,and clarified existing provisions. The Agency has also deleted existingduplicative provisions and replaced one recordkeeping requirement witha certification provision. In addition, the rule adopts performance-orientedstandards when possible. The primary benefit of the final rule is the protection that the standardswill provide to miners who would be endangered by hazards related to fallsof roof, face, and ribs in underground coal mines. In the following summary of the Final Regulatory Flexibility Analysis,MSHA has compared the costs associated with the final requirements withthe costs of the existing requirements. A copy of the full analysis isavailable upon request. In developing cost estimates, MSHA has taken into consideration industry-widesafety practices. Current compliance costs are related to the followingrequirements: Labor, equipment purchase and maintenance, and recordkeeping.In calculating the costs of the final rule, the Agency projected initialcompliance costs and annual recurring costs. MSHA estimates that the initial cost for compliance with the existing requirementsamounts to approximately $189.45 million. Estimated initial costs for thefinal rule will amount to about $187.15 million. MSHA estimates that annualrecurring costs for compliance with the existing requirements amount toapproximately $189.08 million. Estimated recurring costs for the finalrequirements will be about $186.78 million. The final rule represents acost decrease of about $2.3 million when compared to the existing rule.The final regulations will affect approximately 1970 underground miningoperations. MSHA estimates that about 1088 of these mines are small businesses.Small mines represent 55% of the underground mines and 35% of the undergroundsections. Small mines incur about 22% of the compliance cost of the finalrule compared to 21% under the existing rule. The final rule representsa 3.3% ($1.3 million) increase in compliance costs for small mines whencompared to the existing rule. Although the new provision for use of ATRS systems has initial and annuallyrecurring compliance costs of $1.6 million associated with it, the compliancecost of this provision is offset by a $11.4 million reduction in costsrelated to the manual installation of temporary supports. MSHA believesthat the requirement for ATRS systems will result in greater safety forminers during roof bolting activities and, in many instances, will contributeto increased productivity as a result of the mining process moving faster.Under the final rule, alternative compliance methods and a more performance-orientedapproach will reduce compliance costs without diminishing the safety ofminers. For example, under the final rule, the amount and location of roofsupport materials supplied to face areas is left to the mine operator'sdiscretion.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>The recordkeeping provision concerning testing of roof bolts in existingandSection; 75.200-7(b)(3)(iii) is replaced in the final rule with a requirementthat the operator certify by signature and date that testing was conducted.The existing rule contains extensive criteria for evaluating and approvingroof control plans. As a result, comprehensive and often complex roof controlplans are required for each mine. The final rule retains the requirementthat each mine have an approved roof control plan. However, it reducesthe requirements to be specified in a plan by making many of the existingcriteria, which are applicable to all mines, mandatory standards. Therefore,roof control plans will be less complex, addressing only the particularroof control measures appropriate to the conditions at the mine which arenot addressed by the safety standards. The final rule requires that roof control plans be revised to meet therequirements of Subpart C within six months from the effective date ofthe final rule. This provision will only affect roof control plans whichcontain provisions inconsistent or in conflict with the final rule. Aspreviously discussed, many of the provisions that are currently addressedin roof control plans have been included in the final rule as mandatorystandards or have been deleted which, in either case, may no longer needto be addressed in the plan. For example, many existing roof control plansrequire that a torque wrench be kept on roof bolting machines and thatsuch wrench be used to measure torque on roof bolts. Instead of specifyinga tool for evaluating the torque on roof bolts, the final rule requirestorque or tension to be measured, permitting the mine operator to determinethe method, type of equipment to be used, and the location where this equipmentis kept. Revising conflicting provisions in plans will assure that minersare aware of the requirements in effect and will eliminate any ambiguitiesthat may arise. In response to concerns raised by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB),under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, the proposed requirement thatall roof control plans be revised to meet the requirements of Subpart Cwithin six months after the effective date of the rule has been revisedin the final rule. Under the final rule, only plans which contain provisionsthat are in conflict with Subpart C are required to be revised. In accordance with section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980(Title 44 U.S.C. Chapter 35), the collection of information requirementscontained in the final rule have been approved by OMB under control number1219-0004. Comments regarding collection of information requirements maybe directed to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs of OMB,Attention: Desk Officer for the Mine Safety and Health Administration.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 30 CFR Part 75 </ITAG>Mine safety and health, Underground coal mines, Roof, face and rib support.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: January 21, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David C. O'Neal, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Deputy Assistant Secretary for Mine Safety and Health.</ITAG>Part 75, Subchapter O, Chapter I, Title 30 of the Code of Federal Regulationsis amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 75_MANDATORY SAFETY STANDARDS_UNDERGROUND COAL MINES </ITAG>1. The authority citation to 30 CFR Part 75 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>30 U.S.C. 811, 957, and 961.</ITAG>2. Subpart C of Part 75 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Roof Support </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.200 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.201 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.202 Protection from falls of roof, face and ribs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.203 Mining methods. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.204 Roof bolting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.205 Installation of roof support using mining machines with integralroof bolters. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.206 Conventional roof support. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.207 Pillar recovery. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.208 Warning devices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.209 Automated Temporary Roof Support (ATRS) systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.210 Manual installation of temporary support. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.211 Roof testing and scaling. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.212 Rehabilitation of areas with unsupported roof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.213 Roof support removal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.214 Supplemental support materials, equipment and tools. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.215 Longwall mining systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.220 Roof control plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.221 Roof control plan information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.222 Roof control plan_approval criteria. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">75.223 Evaluation and revision of roof control plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Roof Support </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>This Subpart C sets forth requirements for controlling roof, face and ribs,including coal or rock bursts, in underground coal mines. Roof controlsystems installed prior to the effective date of this subpart are not affectedso long as the support system continues to effectively control the roof,face and ribs. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><T3>Automated temporary roof support (ATRS) system. </T3>A device to providetemporary roof support from a location where the equipment operator isprotected from roof falls. <T3>Pillar recovery. </T3>Any reduction in pillar size during retreat mining.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protection from falls of roof, face and ribs. </ITAG>(a) The roof, face and ribs of areas where persons work or travel shallbe supported or otherwise controlled to protect persons from hazards relatedto falls of the roof, face or ribs and coal or rock bursts. (b) No person shall work or travel under unsupported roof unless in accordancewith this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mining methods. </ITAG>(a) The method of mining shall not expose any person to hazards causedby excessive widths of rooms, crosscuts and entries, or faulty pillar recoverymethods. Pillar dimensions shall be compatible with effective control ofthe roof, face and ribs and coal or rock bursts. (b) A sightline or other method of directional control shall be used tomaintain the projected direction of mining in entries, rooms, crosscutsand pillar splits. (c) A sidecut shall be started only from an area that is supported in accordancewith the roof control plan. (d) A working face shall not be mined through into an unsupported areaof active workings, except when the unsupported area is inaccessible. (e) Additional roof support shall be installed where_ (1) The width of the opening specified in the roof control plan is exceededby more than 12 inches; and (2) The distance over which the excessive width exists is more than 5 feet.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof bolting. </ITAG>(a) For roof bolts and accessories addressed in ASTM F432-83, ``StandardSpecification for Roof and Rock Bolts and Accessories'', the mine operatorshall_ (1) Obtain a manufacturer's certification that the material was manufacturedand tested in accordance with the specifications of ASTM F432-83; and,(2) Make this certification available to an authorized representative ofthe Secretary. (b) Roof bolts and accessories not addressed in ASTM F432-83 may be usedprovided they_ (1) Have been successful in supporting the roof in an area of a coal minewith similar strata, opening dimensions and roof stresses; or (2) Have been tested and shown to be effective for supporting the roofin an area of the affected mine which has similar strata, opening dimensionsand roof stresses as the area where the roof bolts are to be used. Duringthe test process, access to the test area shall be limited to persons necessaryto conduct the test. (c)(1) A bearing plate shall be firmly installed with each roof bolt. (2) Bearing plates used directly against the mine roof shall be at least6 inches square or the equivalent, except that where the mine roof is firmand not susceptible to sloughing, bearing plates 5 inches square or theequivalent may be used. (3) Bearing plates used with wood or metal materials shall be at least4 inches square or the equivalent. (4) Wooden materials that are used between a bearing plate and the mineroof in areas which will exist for three years or more shall be treatedto minimize deterioration. (d) When washers are used with roof bolts, the washers shall conform tothe shape of the roof bolt head and bearing plate.(e)(1) The diameter of finishing bits shall be within a tolerance of plusor minus 0.030 inch of the manufacturer's recommended hole diameter forthe anchor used. (2) When separate finishing bits are used, they shall be distinguishablefrom other bits. (f) <T3>Tensioned roof bolts. </T3>(1) Roof bolts that provide support by creatinga beam of laminated strata shall be at least 30 inches long. Roof boltsthat provide support by suspending the roof from overlying stronger stratashall be long enough to anchor at least 12 inches into the stronger strata.(2) Test holes, spaced at intervals specified in the roof control plan,shall be drilled to a depth of at least 12 inches above the anchorage horizonof mechanically anchored tensioned bolts being used. When a test hole indicatesthat bolts would not anchor in competent strata, corrective action shallbe taken. (3) The installed torque or tension ranges for roof bolts as specifiedin the roof control plan shall maintain the integrity of the support systemand shall not exceed the yield point of the roof bolt nor anchorage capacityof the strata. (4) In each roof bolting cycle, the actual torque or tension of the firsttensioned roof bolt installed with each drill head shall be measured immediatelyafter it is installed. Thereafter, for each drill head used, at least oneroof bolt out of every four installed shall be measured for actual torqueor tension. If the torque or tension of any of the roof bolts measuredis not within the range specified in the roof control plan, correctiveaction shall be taken. (5) In working places from which coal is produced during any portion ofa 24-hour period, the actual torque or tension on at least one out of everyten previously installed mechanically anchored tensioned roof bolts shallbe measured from the outby corner of the last open crosscut to the facein each advancing section. Corrective action shall be taken if the majorityof the bolts measured_ (i) Do not maintain at least 70 percent of the minimum torque or tensionspecified in the roof control plan, 50 percent if the roof bolt platesbear against wood; or (ii) Have exceeded the maximum specified torque or tension by 50 percent.(6) The mine operator or a person designated by the operator shall certifyby signature and date that measurements required by paragraph (f)(5) ofthis section have been made. This certification shall be maintained forat least one year and shall be made available to an authorized representativeof the Secretary and representatives of the miners. (7) Tensioned roof bolts installed in the roof support pattern shall notbe used to anchor trailing cables or used for any other purpose that couldaffect the tension of the bolt. Hanging trailing cables, line brattice,telephone lines, or other similar devices which do not place sudden loadson the bolts are permitted. (8) Angle compensating devices shall be used to compensate for the anglewhen tensioned roof bolts are installed at angles greater than 5 degreesfrom the perpendicular to the bearing plate. (g) <T3>Non-tensioned grouted roof bolts. </T3>The first non-tensioned groutedroof bolt installed during each roof bolting cycle shall be tested duringor immediately after the first row of bolts has been installed. If thebolt tested does not withstand at least 150 foot-pounds of torque withoutrotating in the hole, corrective action shall be taken. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Installation of roof support using mining machines with integral roofbolters. </ITAG>When roof bolts are installed by a continuous mining machine with intregalroof bolting equipment: (a) The distance between roof bolts shall not exceed 10 feet crosswise.(b) Roof bolts to be installed 9 feet or more apart shall be installedwith a wooden crossbar at least 3 inches thick and 8 inches wide, or materialwhich provides equivalent support. (c) Roof bolts to be installed more than 8 feet but less than 9 feet apartshall be installed with a wooden plank at least 2 inches thick and 8 incheswide, or material which provides equivalent support. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.206 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conventional roof support. </ITAG>(a) When conventional roof support materials are used as the only meansof support_ (1) The width of any opening shall not exceed 20 feet; (2) The spacing of roadway roof support shall not exceed 5 feet; (3)(i) Supports shall be installed to within 5 feet of the uncut face;(ii) When supports nearest the face must be removed to facilitate the operationof face equipment, equivalent temporary support shall be installed priorto removing the supports; (4) Straight roadways shall not exceed 16 feet wide where full overheadsupport is used and 14 feet wide where only posts are used; (5) Curved roadways shall not exceed 16 feet wide; and (6) The roof at the entrance of all openings along travelways which areno longer needed for storing supplies or for travel of equipment shallbe supported by extending the line of support across the opening. (b) Conventional roof support materials shall meet the following specifications:(1) The minimum diameter of cross-sectional area of wooden posts shallbe as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s10,11,11</C> <H1>Post length (in inches) </H1><H1>Diameter of round posts (in inches) </H1><H1>Cross-sectional area of split posts (in square inches)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">60 or less <D>4 </D><D>13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 60 to 84 <D>5 </D><D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 84 to 108 <D>6 </D><D>28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 108 to 132 <D>7 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 132 to 156 <D>8 </D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 156 to 180 <D>9 </D><D>64</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 180 to 204 <D>10 </D><D>79</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 204 to 228 <D>11 </D><D>95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over 228 <D>12 </D><D>113</D></ITAG></ITAG>(2) Wooden materials used for support shall have the following dimensions:(i) Cap blocks and footings shall have flat sides and be at least 2 inchesthick, 4 inches wide and 12 inches long. (ii) Crossbars shall have a minimum cross-sectional area of 24 square inchesand be at least 3 inches thick. (iii) Planks shall be at least 6 inches wide and 1 inch thick. (3) Cribbing materials shall have at least two parallel flat sides. (c) A cluster of two or more posts that provide equivalent strength maybe used to meet the requirements of paragraph (b)(1) of this section, exceptthat no post shall have a diameter less than 4 inches or have a cross-sectionalarea less than 13 square inches. (d) Materials other than wood used for support shall have support strengthat least equivalent to wooden material meeting the applicable provisionsof this section. (e) Posts and jacks shall be tightly installed on solid footing. (f) When posts are installed under roof susceptible to sloughing a capblock, plank, crossbar or materials that are equally effective shall beplaced between the post and the roof. (g) Blocks used for lagging between the roof and crossbars shall be spacedto distribute the load. (h) Jacks used for roof support shall be used with at least 36 square inchesof roof bearing surface. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pillar recovery. </ITAG>Pillar recovery shall be conducted in the following manner, unless otherwisespecified in the roof control plan: (a) Full and partial pillar recovery shall not be conducted on the samepillar line, except where physical conditions such as unstable floor orroof, falls of roof, oil and gas well barriers or surface subsidence requirethat pillars be left in place. (b) Before mining is started in a pillar split or lift_ (1) At least two rows of breaker posts or equivalent support shall be installed_(i) As close to the initial intended breakline as practicable; and (ii) Across each opening leading into an area where full or partial pillarextraction has been completed. (2) A row of roadside-radius (turn) posts or equivalent support shall beinstalled leading into the split or lift. (c) Before mining is started on a final stump_ (1) At least 2 rows of posts or equivalent support shall be installed onnot more than 4-foot centers on each side of the roadway; and (2) Only one open roadway, which shall not exceed 16 feet wide, shall leadfrom solid pillars to the final stump of a pillar. Where posts are usedas the sole means of roof support, the width of the roadway shall not exceed14 feet. (d) During open-end pillar extraction, at least 2 rows of breaker postsor equivalent support shall be installed on not more than 4-foot centers.These supports shall be installed between the lift to be started and thearea where pillars have been extracted. These supports shall be maintainedto within 7 feet of the face and the width of the roadway shall not exceed16 feet. Where posts are used as the sole means of roof support, the widthof the roadway shall not exceed 14 feet. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.208 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Warning devices. </ITAG>Except during the installation of roof supports, the end of permanent roofsupport shall be posted with a readily visible warning, or a physical barriershall be installed to impede travel beyond permanent support. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Automated Temporary Roof Support (ATRS) systems. </ITAG>(a) Except in anthracite mines and as specified in paragraphs (b) and (c)of this section, an ATRS system shall be used with roof bolting machinesand continuous-mining machines with integral roof bolters operated in aworking section. The requirements of this paragraph shall be met accordingto the following schedule: (1) All new machines ordered after March 28, 1988. (2) All existing machines operated in mining heights of 36 inches or moreafter March 28, 1989; and (3) All existing machines operated in mining heights of 30 inches or morebut less than 36 inches after March 28, 1990. (b) After March 28, 1990 the use of ATRS systems with existing roof boltingmachines and continuous-mining machines with integral roof bolters operatedin a working section where the mining height is less than 30 inches shallbe addressed in the roof control plan. (c) Alternative means of temporary support shall be used, as specifiedin the roof control plan, when_ (1) Mining conditions or circumstances prevent the use of an ATRS system;or (2) Temporary supports are installed in conjunction with an ATRS system.(d) Persons shall work or travel between the support device of the ATRSsystem and another support, and the distance between the support deviceof the ATRS system and support to the left, right or beyond the ATRS system,shall not exceed 5 feet. (e) Each ATRS system shall meet each of the following: (1) The ATRS system shall elastically support a deadweight load measuredin pounds of at least 450 times each square foot of roof intended to besupported, but in no case less than 11,250 pounds. (2) The controls that position and set the ATRS system shall be_ (i) Operable from under permanently supported roof; or (ii) Located in a compartment, which includes a deck, that provides theequipment operator with overhead and lateral protection, and has the structuralcapacity to elastically support a deadweight load of at least 18,000 pounds.(3) All jacks affecting the capacity of the ATRS system and compartmentshall have check valves or equivalent devices that will prevent rapid collapsein the event of a system failure. (4) Except for the main tram controls, tram controls for positioning theequipment to set the ATRS system shall limit the speed of the equipmentto a maximum of 80 feet-per-minute. (f) The support capacity of each ATRS system and the structural capacityof each compartment shall be certified by a registered engineer as meetingthe applicable requirements of paragraphs (e)(1) and (e)(2) of this section.The certifications shall be made available to an authorized representativeof the Secretary and representative of the miners. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manual installation of temporary support. </ITAG>(a) When manually installing temporary support, only persons engaged ininstalling the support shall proceed beyond permanent support. (b) When manually installing temporary supports, the first temporary supportshall be set no more than 5 feet from a permanent roof support and therib. All temporary supports shall be set so that the person installingthe supports remains between the temporary support being set and two othersupports which shall be no more than 5 feet from the support being installed.Each temporary support shall be completely installed prior to installingthe next temporary support. (c) All temporary supports shall be placed on no more than 5-foot centers.(d) Once temporary supports have been installed, work or travel beyondpermanent roof support shall be done between temporary supports and thenearest permanent support or between other temporary supports. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.211</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof testing and scaling. </ITAG>(a) A visual examination of the roof, face and ribs shall be made immediatelybefore any work is started in an area and thereafter as conditions warrant.(b) Where the mining height permits and the visual examination does notdisclose a hazardous condition, sound and vibration roof tests, or otherequivalent tests, shall be made where supports are to be installed. Whensound and vibration tests are made, they shall be conducted_ (1) After the ATRS system is set against the roof and before other supportis installed; or (2) Prior to manually installing a roof support. This test shall beginunder supported roof and progress no further than the location where thenext support is to be installed. (c) When a hazardous roof, face, or rib condition is detected, the conditionshall be corrected before there is any other work or travel in the affectedarea. If the affected area is left unattended, each entrance to the areashall be posted with a readily visible warning, or a physical barrier shallbe installed to impede travel into the area. (d) A bar for taking down loose material shall be available in the workingplace or on all face equipment except haulage equipment. Bars providedfor taking down loose material shall be of a length and design that willallow the removal of loose material from a position that will not exposethe person performing this work to injury from falling material. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.212</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Rehabilitation of areas with unsupported roof. </ITAG>(a) Before rehabilitating each area where a roof fall has occurred or theroof has been removed by mining machines or by blasting_ (1) The mine operator shall establish the clean up and support proceduresthat will be followed; (2) All persons assigned to perform rehabilitation work shall be instructedin the clean-up and support procedures; and (3) Ineffective, damaged or missing roof support at the edge of the areato be rehabilitated shall be replaced or other equivalent support installed.(b) All persons who perform rehabilitation work shall be experienced inthis work or they shall be supervised by a person experienced in rehabilitationwork who is designated by the mine operator. (c) Where work is not being performed to rehabilitate an area in activeworkings where a roof fall has occurred or the roof has been removed bymining machines or by blasting, each entrance to the area shall be supportedby at least one row of posts on not more than 5-foot centers, or equallyeffective support. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.213</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof support removal. </ITAG>(a)(1) All persons who perform the work of removing permanent roof supportsshall be experienced in this work, or they shall be supervised by a personexperienced in removing roof supports who is designated by the mine operator.(2) Only persons with at least one year of underground mining experienceshall perform permanent roof support removal work. (b) a person designated by the mine operator shall, prior to the removalof permanent roof supports, examine the roof conditions in the area wherethe supports are to be removed. (c) Prior to the removal of crossbars, beams, or other similar supports,a row of temporary supports on not more than 5-foot centers or equivalentsupport shall be installed across the opening within 4 feet of the supportsbeing removed. Additional supports shall be installed where necessary toassure safe removal. (d)(1) Prior to the removal of roof bolts, temporary support shall be installedas close as practicable to each bolt being removed. After the removal ofroof bolts, persons removing the temporary supports shall perform thiswork from a location under permanent supports which have not been disturbed.(2) Roof bolts shall not be removed where full pillar extraction is conducted.(e) Each entrance to an area where supports have been removed shall beposted with a readily visible warning or a physical barrier shall be installedto impede travel into the area. (f) Except when supports are removed by persons who are in a remote locationunder supported roof, no permanent support shall be removed where_(1) Roof bolt torque or tension measurements or the condition of conventionalsupport indicate excessive loading; (2) Roof fractures are present; or (3) There is any other indication that the roof is structurally weak. (g) Except for paragraph (b) of this section, the provisions of this sectiondo not apply to removal of conventional supports for starting crosscutsand pillar splits or lifts.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.214</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Supplemental support materials, equipment and tools. </ITAG>(a) A supply of supplementary roof support materials and the tools andequipment necessary to install the materials shall be available at a readilyaccessible location on each working section or within four crosscuts ofeach working section.(b) The quantity of support materials and tools and equipment maintainedavailable in accordance with this section shall be sufficient to supportthe roof if adverse roof conditions are encountered, or in the event ofan accident involving a fall.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Longwall mining systems.</ITAG>For each longwall mining section, the roof control plan shall specify_(a) The methods that will be used to maintain a safe travelway out of thesection through the tailgate side of the longwall; and (b) The procedures that will be followed if a ground failure prevents travelout of the section through the tailgate side of the longwall.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof control plan. </ITAG>(a)(1) Each mine operator shall develop and follow a roof control plan,approved by the District Manager, that is suitable to the prevailing geologicalconditions, and the mining system to be used at the mine. Additional measuresshall be taken to protect persons if unusual hazards are encountered. (2) The proposed roof control plan and any revisions to the plan shallbe submitted, in writing, to the District Manager. When revisions to aroof control plan are proposed, only the revised pages need to be submittedunless otherwise specified by the District Manager. (b)(1) The mine operator will be notified in writing of the approval ordenial of approval of a proposed roof control plan or proposed revision.(2) When approval of a proposed plan or revision is denied, the deficienciesof the plan or revision and recommended changes will be specified and themine operator will be afforded an opportunity to discuss the deficienciesand changes with the District Manager.(3) Before new support materials, devices or systems other than roof boltsand accessories, are used as the only means of roof support, the DistrictManager may require that their effectiveness be demonstrated by experimentalinstallations. (c) No proposed roof control plan or revision to a roof control plan shallbe implemented before it is approved. (d) Before implementing an approved revision to a roof control plan, allpersons who are affected by the revision shall be instructed in its provisions.(e) The approved roof control plan and any revisions shall be availableto the miners and representative of miners at the mine. (f) Existing roof control plans that conflict with this Subpart C shallbe revised to meet the requirements of this Subpart C by September 28,1988. This paragraph (f) shall expire March 28, 1989.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0004)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.221</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof control plan information. </ITAG>(a) The following information shall be included in each roof control plan:(1) The name and address of the company. (2) The name, address, mine identification number and location of the mine.(3) The name and title of the company official responsible for the plan.(4) A typical columnar section of the mine strata which shall_ (i) Show the name and the thickness of the coalbed to be mined and anypersistent partings; (ii) Identify the type and show the thickness of each stratum up to andincluding the main roof above the coalbed and for distance of at least10 feet below the coalbed; and (iii) Indicate the maximum cover over the area to be mined. (5) A description and drawings of the sequence of installation and spacingof supports for each method of mining used. (6) When an ATRS system is used, the maximum distance that an ATRS systemis to be set beyond the last row of permanent support. (7) When tunnel liners or arches are to be used for roof support, specificationsand installation procedures for the liners or arches. (8) Drawings indicating the planned width of openings, size of pillars,method or pillar recovery, and the sequence of mining pillars. (9) A list of all support materials required to be used in the roof, faceand rib control system, including, if roof bolts are to be installed_ (i) The length, diameter, grade and type of anchorage unit to be used;(ii) The drill hole size to be used; and (iii) The installed torque or tension range for tensioned roof bolts. (10) When mechanically anchored tensioned roof bolts are used, the intervalsat which test holes will be drilled.(11) A description of the method of protecting persons_ (i) From falling material at drift openings; and (ii) When mining approaches within 150 feet of an outcrop. (b) Each drawing submitted with a roof control plan shall contain a legendexplaining all symbols used and shall specify the scale of the drawingwhich shall not be less than 5 feet to the inch or more than 20 feet tothe inch. (c) All roof control plan information, including drawings, shall be submittedon 8\1/2\ by 11 inch paper, or paper folded to this size.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0004)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;75.222</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roof control plan-approval criteria. </ITAG>(a) This section sets forth the criteria that shall be considered on amine-by-mine basis in the formulation and approval of roof control plansand revisions. Additional measures may be required in plans by the DistrictManager. Roof control plans that do not conform to the applicable criteriain this section may be approved by the District Manager, provided thateffective control of the roof, face and ribs can be maintained.(b) <T3>Roof Bolting.</T3> (1) Roof bolts should be installed on centers notexceeding 5 feet lengthwise and crosswise, except as specified in andSection;75.205.(2) When tensioned roof bolts are used as a means of roof support, thetorque or tension range should be capable of supporting roof bolt loadsof at least 50 percent of either the yield point of the bolt or anchoragecapacity of the strata, whichever is less. (3) Any opening that is more than 20 feet wide should be supported by acombination of roof bolts and conventional supports. (4) In any opening more than 20 feet wide_ (i) Posts should be installed to limit each roadway to 16 feet wide wherestraight and 18 feet wide where curved; and (ii) A row of posts should be set for each 5 feet of space between theroadway posts and the ribs. (5) Openings should not be more than 30 feet wide. (c) <T3>Installation of roof support using mining machines with integral roofbolters.</T3> (1) Before an intersection or pillar split is started, roofbolts should be installed on at least 5-foot centers where the work isperformed. (2) Where the roof is supported by only two roof bolts crosswise, openingsshould not be more than 16 feet wide. (d) <T3>Pillar recovery.</T3> (1) During development, any dimension of a pillarshould be at least 20 feet. (2) Pillar splits and lifts should not be more than 20 feet wide.(3) Breaker posts should be installed on not more than 4-foot centers.(4) Roadside-radius (turn) posts, or equivalent support, should be installedon not more than 4-foot centers leading into each pillar split or lift.(5) Before full pillar recovery is started in areas where roof bolts areused as the only means of roof support and openings are more than 16 feetwide, at least one row of posts should be installed to limit the roadwaywidth to 16 feet. These posts should be_(i) Extended from the entrance to the split through the intersection outbythe pillar in which the split or lift is being made; and(ii) Spaced on not more than 5-foot centers.(e) <T3>Unsupported openings at intersections.</T3> Openings that create anintersection should be permanently supported or at least one row of temporarysupports should be installed on not more than 5-foot centers across theopening before any other work or travel in the intersection.(f) <T3>ATRS systems in working sections where the mining height is below 30inches.</T3> In working sections where the mining height is below 30 inches,an ATRS system should be used to the extent practicable during the installationof roof bolts with roof bolting machines and continuous-mining machineswith integral roof bolters.(g) <T3>Longwall mining systems.</T3> (1) Systematic supplemental support shouldbe installed throughout_(i) The tailgate entry of the first longwall panel prior to any mining;and(ii) In the proposed tailgate entry of each subsequent panel in advanceof the frontal abutment stresses of the panel being mined.(2) When a ground failure prevents travel out of the section through thetailgate side of the longwall section, the roof control plan should address_(i) Notification of miners that the travelway is blocked;(ii) Re-instruction of miners regarding escapeways and escape proceduresin the event of an emergency;(iii) Re-instruction of miners on the availability and use of self-containedself-rescue devices;(iv) Monitoring and evaluation of the air entering the longwall section;(v) Location and effectiveness of the two-way communication systems; and(vi) A means of transportation from the section to the main line.(3) The plan provisions addressed by paragraph (g)(2) of this section shouldremain in effect until a travelway is reestablished on the tailgate sideof a longwall section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 75.223</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evaluation and revision of roof control plan.</ITAG>(a) Revisions of the roof control plan shall be proposed by the operator_(1) When conditions indicate that the plan is not suitable for controllingthe roof, face, ribs, or coal or rock bursts; or(2) When accident and injury experience at the mine indicates the planis inadequate. The accident and injury experience at each mine shall bereviewed at least every six months.(b) Each unplanned roof fall and rib fall and coal or rock burst that occursin the active workings shall be plotted on a mine map if it_(1) Is above the anchorage zone where roof bolts are used;(2) Impairs ventilation;(3) Impedes passage of persons;(4) Causes miners to be withdrawn from the area affected; or(5) Disrupts regular mining activities for more than one hour.(c) The mine map of which roof falls are plotted shall be available atthe mine site for inspection by authorized representatives of the Secretaryand representatives of miners at the mine.(d) The roof control plan for each mine shall be reviewed every six monthsby an authorized representative of the Secretary. This review shall takeinto consideration any falls of the roof, face and ribs and the adequacyof the support systems used at the time.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number1219-0004)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-1560-Filed 1-26-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-43-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>